


These three who had been friends since middle school were currently first-year high school students. Harboring a faint hope that if they advanced to high school then it would be an exciting springtime of their lives that didn’t exist in middle school……that something would happen. In actuality, there wasn’t really anything particular that happened, and they were spending normal days that held no difference with their middle school period.



Actually, the school they were enrolled into, was the high school where the world-shaking occult case happened a year ago, and among the current third-years, there were also the seniors who were directly related with that case. That too became the primary cause that inflated the hope they were harboring that “something” might happen in their high school life (they received fierce opposition from their parents when they chose this school as the first choice but they persuaded their parents) but……there wasn’t really anything that happened.



Of course, there was also a decisively different point before and after the occult case, and that was something that undoubtedly made them delighted from the bottom of their hearts that they enrolled into their current high school. That point was……



「Aa, I want to have a date with Yue-senpai.」



「I want to marry Shia-senpai.」



「Shirasaki-senpai……is great isn’t she.」



The three were facing up to the ceiling while leaking out their wild delusions, that rather than with these male friends with whom they had a stuffily undesirable but inseparable relationship, they would rather walk around the city on a holiday with the seniors they yearned for. And then hearing each other’s words, they exchanged glances among them. And then, they spoke words to each other at the same time.



「「「Don’t say something like that. It feels empty.」」」



The three simultaneously sighed so deeply to the degree that it would surely let out all the happiness that they possessed. While the images of the seniors they yearned for were floating at the back of their minds, at the same time they lamented the fact of how the gaze of their yearned person was directed only at a single person. Furthermore, that person was the same person for the three different girls they yearned for, and that fact was known not only in school, but even the whole neighborhood had already known that fact. (TN: In Japan, there is the saying that sighing will cause your happiness to get away from you.)



In addition to that, it didn’t stop with just those three seniors, something like that was just……



「Shit, even though in this world, there are many people in love poverty like us, that shitty bastard-」



「O, oi. Stop that. Did you forget already, about the guys that were turned like that after speaking ill of that “you-know-who” behind his back?」



「……Are you talking about the captain of the karate club, how he got transfigured into a big sis the next day?」



「There is also that, but there are also people like the ace of the soccer club who got planted with a phobia of females, or the math teacher who was always acting sarcastically one day suddenly started using polite language at “you know who” like a military personnel……」



「Bu, but, those were lies, right? Those were just like urban legends, right? Look, those guys, they are the ‘returnees’. Those kinds of stories were created a lot half for fun……in fact, there aren’t any seniors or teachers like in those rumors.」



「That’s, you’re right but……」



Stories that sounded like an urban legend――but speaking about that, even the story about the “real harem” also “sounded like an urban legend” in that case……In the end, that was what the three of them came to think but they didn’t say it out loud. It was the truth that students and teachers that became the basis of the rumors couldn’t be found in the school, but at the same time, there were also rumors that those rumored guys had transferred schools or changed jobs.



It was unknown what was truth and what was a lie, and that also granted uneasy feelings that they couldn’t describe. Especially because the new first-years didn’t know about the ‘returnees’――the people who returned back from being spirited away in mass were called like that by society, and like that the naming stuck―― school life right after they returned from the occult case.



Naturally, there were also a lot of first-year students who were ignorant of the ways of the world and got carried away. They attempted to go on the offensive towards the beautiful seniors and foreign students that were among the ‘returnee’ group; but……most of them were turned into ash after being shown the relationship of those beauties with “that person”, or they were stopped by the male seniors of the ‘returnee’ group with kind gazes when they attempted to take malicious actions out of jealousy. After a few months passed, those kinds of people eventually became a little bit more adult like from understanding in their hearts that “it’s just how it is”.



Even so, as expected, there was no way the yearning towards the seniors who were so beautiful that even celebrities couldn’t win against them would disappear, and that went even truer with the jealousy towards that “you-know-who” who was literally monopolizing those beautiful seniors like a joke. Grumbles or cursing would sometimes leak out suddenly toward that you-know-who like this.



「Haa……hm? O, oi, that.」



「Hm?」



「Aa?」



One of the male students for some reason turned his gaze outside the window, and then he noticed that group and raised his voice. The other two got curious and moved their gazes to follow his, and there, at an unbelievable timing, the rumored group was walking on the street on the other side.



It was that “you-know-who” ――Nagumo Hajime, and his wives.



「Oi oi, just why are those people here?」



「That is, no matter how you see it, this must be a date.」



「As always, what an amazing line up, huh……wait, that child riding on “that person’s” shoulder, is that the rumored daughter? So it’s true that he has a child? Isn’t that bad……」



*bita-!* The three boys clung on the window glass, staring hungrily at Hajime who was walking nonchalantly while being surrounded by extraordinarily beautiful girls and women in enjoyment. Seeing it from the viewpoint of the people inside the restaurant, the figures of those three were like geckos that were clinging to a window, it was a relatively strange sight. It almost caused the 0 yen smile of the restaurant waitress to crumble. (TN: 0 yen smile=a free smile, a business smile)



「Yue-senpai, Shia-senpai……also Shirasaki-senpai and Yaegashi-senpai are there too. Next are the black haired beauty and the blonde beauty that were sometimes seen at the school festival or after school……」



「Just what kind of perfect lineup is this. Dammit it all-」



「Aa, also that child……she is super cute. There is even a beautiful little girl……how envious.」



「Eh?」



「Eh?」



「Eh?」



The last statement caused the three to spontaneously leak out stupid sounds while they faced each other. Or rather, two of them were making 「Eh, this guy is seriously, that kind of guy?」 look at the last one while drawing back. That last person seeing that tried to solve the misunderstanding in panic.



「Ah, those senpai are getting farther see.」



「Yosh, we got nothing to do anyway, let’s try following them yeah. What kind of date a real harem man is having, this can be used for future reference.」



「Hey, you guys are misunderstanding, okay? I’m not like that, okay?」



「But, will it be okay? From the rumor, those people for some reason are really sharp I heard. Won’t it be bad if we got found out?」



「This is in the middle of the city. There are also a lot of people so there won’t be any problem. Besides, this is that group of beauties we are talking about. There is a high chance some punks are going to pick a fight with them. At that time, what kind of action “that person” will take……perhaps we are going to understand a bit, whether those rumors about the senpai that got turned into a big sis or the teacher that got turned into pseudo-military are the truth or not, don’t you think so? You are curious, right?」



「He, heey, listen to me. I really, don’t have any interest for little kids at all. I was just simply……」



「Indeed……wait, this is bad, they are seriously getting farther. For now, let’s go first.」



「Yoosh. Well, even just paying respect to the figure of Yue-senpai and the others in casual clothing on the holiday is already the best anyway.」



「Yeah-」



「Oi wait! Don’t ignore me here! You guys are seriously mistaken! No, really!」



Until the end, the noisy three students didn’t notice the previous waitress whose eyes weren’t smiling anymore even though the lips were still smiling. They exited the restaurant with noisy footsteps. And then, from the entrance downstairs, a yell of 「Rather, I am someone that gets excited from adult woman, like female teachers, or widows heree-」 that would cause headaches could be heard……the waitresses sighed deeply hearing that.



「Heeey, you guys are really mistaken. okay?」



「Geez, we got it already.」



「You like female teachers or widows. That was what you were saying, right? Rather than that, don’t make so much noise. We are going to get found out here.」



「Even though I was on the brink of getting treated like a perverted lolicon just now, you guys……」



By the time he did a coming out with his outrageous fetish at the fast-food restaurant, he was already definitely a pervert, but no one there made such a retort. Rather than that, it was more important to observe carefully the party of Hajime and the others, who were currently enjoying window shopping, at the end of their gazes.



While they were observing, Hajime’s group entered a large three-story store that was fairly famous for its ladies fashion. From across the glass window, the trio could see how the shop employees and other customers were taken aback for a moment, but the shop employees were immediately recovering their usual attitudes like a pro while the other female customers were sending their gazes as though they had encountered a celebrity. The males who were taken along with the female customers were staring in fascination in a daze.



Amidst those, the aforementioned group didn’t look particularly bothered with all the attention and they only looked around inside the store. Sometimes the female camp would ask for Hajime’s opinion and try on some clothes. To that, Hajime changed Myuu’s position from on top of his shoulders to carrying her with one hand, and then he seemed to say one or two sentences back regarding his impressions of the clothes. Just from looking it could clearly be seen that Yue and the others were swinging from joy and nervousness when they were listening to what Hajime was saying.



「……By any chance, is that man giving back different impressions to all of them respectively?」



「If he is just saying “that suits you”, then at the very least it will be said six times from only one round you know. That would make him look like a broken record in that case.」



「Based on the expressions of all those girls, it seems that man is saying different impressions each time without fail. ……Is this, the true power of a harem man……」



The trio were continuing to observe by hiding in the shadows of merchandise even while being seen suspiciously by other customers and employees. Their expressions changed into a shudder. If it was them who were asked for impressions by that many women changing clothes multiple times like that……without a doubt, in their case they would be turned into a broken speaker saying the same thing.



But, after that, after the group was feeling satisfied walking around inside the store, the three mediocre high school students (first-years) were made to taste further the dreadfulness of a real harem man’s deed.



「Wa, wait-. Don’t tell me, he is planning to pay for that many clothes!?」



「That’s a lie right-. This store, it’s really expensive you know! Even if each of them only buys one piece of clothing, there will be six pieces……is that guy’s financial strength a monster!?」



Ahead of the gaze of the trembling trio, were six pieces of clothing that were put on the register. Yue, Shia, Tio, and Remia looked happy, while Kaori and Shizuku looked a bit apologetic. Even so, they were staring with undisguised happiness at the back of Hajime who was speaking with the clerk.



Hajime handed a card to the clerk and finished the bill, then he wrote the address for the mailing destination and turned back. He only shrugged towards the thanks that were said to him by the female camp before urging them to continue the date. And then there was Myuu who repeatedly lightly hit Hajime’s cheek in protest because it was only her who wasn’t bought some clothes due to the lack of size that matched her body, but as though to say that he got it, Hajime turned a gentle gaze at her and nodded before leaving the store.



The customers who were accompanied by lovers or friends, and the employees who were left behind then let out a deep sigh that was filled with various thoughts.



「Come to think of it, once, I heard a rumor. “That person’s” parents seem to be the president of a game company and a popular manga author. Also, it seems the person himself also did some part-time work, and it was said that he earned quite a lot.」



「Aa. I also heard something like that. In addition, there was also some joking rumor that the person himself was starting up a company related to jewelry. They said that that black haired beauty and that blonde beauty are the company director or the secretary or something.」



While following behind Hajime’s group, the trio were laughing dryly after conversing about the rumors that originally sounded like a joke but now seemed to have some truth in it after what they witnessed.



In fact, that rumor hit the bull’s eye. When Hajime just returned back to this world, he got really busy with taking care of large problems, like the forgery of everything that was related to government administration, including family register, etc., and also countermeasures against the mass media. By the time all of those calmed down, he was faced with the problem about providing for Yue and the others. Although he was still a student, as expected it was unacceptable for a man to keep relying on his parents for that. In order to raise his dependability status, he pondered for a way to earn money.



One of his ideas was starting up a jewelry shop. If he was asked why a jewelry shop, of course, it was because he was a transmutation master, and through that, he possessed an unfair method regarding the processing technology of jewels. Depending on the situation, even without any raw ore, as long as he had the Structural Component skill he could possibly create precious stones from scratch.



As for designs, he left it to Remia who unexpectedly displayed a good sense in her ideas while Hajime only transmuted following her designs. Furthermore, just by wearing these accessories that Hajime created, it would improve the physical condition of the wearer, improve the skin, or raise the memorizing ability, anyway the accessories had miraculous effects.



At present, the business was carried out from a small office, with their sales mainly coming from the internet, but even so, Tio, who in this one year was learning economy and management, carried out the administration of the business so he could work while also going to school. Rather, through word of mouth the good design sense and the miraculous effects were promoted further and the business produced quite an earning.



Furthermore, Remia and Tio who weren’t attending school respectively showed their interest in the various design style or economic system of earth, so this jewelry shop that Hajime established wasn’t just killing two birds with one stone, it was already killing three birds with one stone where Remia and Tio also could pursue their interests. Hajime himself was also stretching his hand towards various trades in his own way.



「Magic merchandise is selling like magic huh.」 Seeing Hajime who was making a really crooked smile while saying that caused Shuu and Sumire to avert their eyes at the same time while it went without saying that Yue and the others were enraptured with that Hajime.



「O, oi, it’s finally the development just as we thought! As expected from those seniors. The predator that snapped at the bait is nothing half-assed.」



「Wait, is this, going to be okay? From their appearance, they feel like college students, they are absurdly huge.」



「Le, let’s at least, prepare so that we can contact the police.」



Ahead of the gazes of the trio who were hiding by the nearby signboard while seeing the situation, Hajime’s group, who were going to enter into a children’s clothing shop, were being approached by five men with great body builds that seemed to be college students. The five college students were approaching with smiles on their mouths. Dyed hair, rough clothing, rough expressions, and rough atmospheres, from all those it was obvious that they were the type of people you wouldn’t want to get involved with.



The people in the surroundings were also somehow sensing the trouble that would happen, an uneasy air could be felt from them.



The approach of those fellows caused Hajime to look back and narrow his eyes. And then, the five men arrived before Hajime’s group, the sound of someone gulping could be heard from somewhere, immediately following,



「Hajime-san, also all the girlfriends, greetings ―su-!」



「「「「Greetings ―su-!」」」」



The five scary guys bowed their head simultaneously. Voices and expressions of 「Eee――!!」 were overflowing from the surroundings. The unexpected development also caused the trio to go 「Whyyyy!?」 with their bodies leaning out from the signboard. Amidst those, Hajime was,



「……Aa? Who are you guys?」



He returned a suspicious stare at the scary guys. Getting flustered and a bit shocked by that reply, a man with dyed blonde hair and piercings opened his mouth in a panicked rush.



「I, it’s me, me. Don’t you remember me?」



「Hmph? So this is a “It’s me, me” fraud right to the face……you are quite a novel guy huh.」(TN: “It’s me, me” fraud, when someone unknown called your phone and suddenly said “it’s me, me” without saying any name and in a panicked tone. They would claim that your friend or family just got into an accident and rush you to transfer money to them.) 「Tha, that’s not it! Half a year ago, I picked a fight with Hajime-san together with twenty of my friends. I am Hide that got beaten up black and blue at that time! After that, Hajime-san gave me introductions to my current workplace, and from that, I work together with Hajime-san a few times as an information dealer don’t you remember-」



「……Aah, yep. Hide huh. Hide. Yep. I remember you now.」



「Do, do you really remember mee-」



Hajime obviously didn’t seem to remember, but it would be scary later if this Hide kept asking doggedly (half a year ago, he had tasted “true fear”) so he stopped insisting. That scary face changed into a pathetic look like a puppy that was thrown away.



「So, beaten up information dealer Hide, what’s your business with me?」



「That name feels like it’s going to end up as my nickname, so please spare me from that. Eeerr, I don’t really have any business, but I just caught sight of Hajime-san by chance, so I only came to give a greeting, that’s all.」



「I see. What an honest guy huh. Aa, somehow I recall you. If I remember correctly, you guys are that bunch who got the cold shoulder from Yue and the others, and then you tried to take Myuu hostage as revenge, and in the end, you guys did dogeza while crying to me, right?」



「……Please don’t say anything about that anymore. That is a past that I really want to erase……」



The eyes of Hide and his friends turned empty altogether while their bodies were shivering. One of them looked like they could burst out crying anytime.



After that, Hide and the others who talked a bit with Hajime said that if it was children’s clothing then they knew of a shop of an acquaintance nearby that was little-known yet had good merchandise, and upon receiving that information Hajime and the others headed there. Seeing the five scary guys who were like well-trained soldiers from how they continued to lower their heads until the figure of Hajime’s group disappeared from view, it went without saying that it caused the gaze of the surroundings to become wordless.



「Somehow, it was different from expectation……」



「What we expected had already happened, and it was settled by “that person”, and this is the result huh.」



「……“Settlement” that made that dangerous looking older bunch act like loyal dogs, huh……those guys, did you two see they were trembling……」



「「……」」



For some reason, the bodies of the trio shuddered suddenly. And then at that time when they were pondering whether to continue tailing or to just stop it already, they witnessed the spectacle of Hajime’s group exiting the children’s clothing shop and the delinquent bunch who caught sight of that once more bowing their heads to Hajime just like before.



The trio somehow missed their chance to speak of stopping their observation. And while that trio was still watching attentively, they saw Hajime and the others who asked for a good café this time before they walked away and the delinquents who, as expected, bowed their heads for seeing them off.



Even during the walk to the café, the scene of the young bunch who obviously had preferences of living in a back alley standing up in a panic to give a greeting while bowing their heads when they happened to catch sight of Hajime, entered their sight many times.



Even when they returned back to the main street the same thing happened, bunches of guys who seemed to be of that kind would suddenly lower their head with gazes that were filled with terror and respect when they crossed over Hajime’s path.



And the clincher of all that was when a black foreign car stopped near Hajime and group who were having a pleasant chat at an open terrace café. From that car, a bunch of men wearing suits and clad in a dangerous atmosphere that would blow away the likes of the delinquents until now were getting out, and as expected, even these dangerous men were also greeting while bowing their heads to Hajime. Naturally, the atmosphere of the café froze due to this.



And then, the last man that got out of the car, an old man around sixty years old wearing a hakama……no matter how anyone looked at him, that man couldn’t be seen as anything other than a yakuza boss. That man’s villainous face distorted even more villainous when he talked to Hajime.



「As always, you are in a nice position eh. Having women serving you in this kind of open place in the middle of the day, even though you are just a brat. I want to see the face of the parent of someone like you.」



「If it’s the face of my parents than you know them already, right? After all, when you tried to take revenge on me who crushed your idiotic dealings, you thoroughly investigated my surroundings. Rather, just what business do you have with me here, huh? Just as you can see, I’m in the middle of a date now. If you intentionally stopped your car just for saying sarcasm to me, then I’m going to crush you underfoot again you know?」



「Ka ka-, don’t say something scary like that. As the side that actually got done in, I cannot take that as a joke here.」



“Don’t run off your mouth like that against a yakuza you!” The guests and café employees around, and also the trio were screaming like that inside their hearts, but when they heard the continuing words of the yakuza boss, this time they froze from a different significance. They thought 「Just now, what did the boss say?」



「It’s great that this is Japan, and I’m a virtuous Japanese huh. If that wasn’t the case, by this time you guys would have already all become dust that dances in the world’s sky.」



「……Do you have the self-awareness that your speech is more yakuza than the actual yakuza? Haa, well that’s fine. About why I called out to you like this……」



It seemed that the reason for the yakuza boss calling out to Hajime was, once in the past various things happened and one group of this boss’s yakuza got annihilated by Hajime (all members of the group were sent to the hospital half-dead while its young leader had no hope of recovery), now this group was revived back, and the replacement of the former young leader of this group had been formally decided, so this boss came to Hajime in order to make the new young leader give his greetings. (TN: In Japan, the big boss of the yakuza (called oyabun) stands at the top of the organization. The yakuza organization itself is divided into several groups where each group is led by a young leader (wakagashira) that answer directly to the oyabun.)



It seemed that it had become a new common sense, that if you wanted to survive in the area around the city where Hajime was living, then you must not forget about Hajime’s existence. Due to that, the new young leader who knew about the hellish scenery of that time now carried out the inauguration greeting to Hajime expressionlessly while being unable to hide the cold sweat that was dripping from his face.



There was no way Hajime would come if he was called to attend the inauguration event, and it was unknown what kind of punishment they would receive if they intruded on Hajime’s house or school. However, if the new young leader didn’t show his face to Hajime, then they wouldn’t be able to calm down no matter what when thinking about the future. While the yakuza boss was at his wits end about what to do while traveling by car he caught sight of Hajime’s group by accident. Thinking 「This is a chance-! Let’s take care of the unpleasant matter all at once! There is no way we are going to get assaulted in a public place, that’s unthinkable!」, he called out to Hajime like this to give his greeting.



……It was really unclear which side was the yakuza.



「I see. Well, as long as you guys don’t do anything that involves the people in my surroundings, you can do whatever you want. However, previously there was still some extenuating circumstances that I took into consideration, so your guys got off with only being half-dead, but there is no next time. If in the future, even if only indirectly, something happens……I’ll present you guys with a really lovely second life. Forcefully. Got that?」



Saying that Hajime’s mouth split into a crescent moon shape.



「……As expected, you are more yakuza than the yakuza.」



The people at the surroundings heavily sympathized 「It’s exactly as you said, Oyabin-san!」inside their hearts. And then, the yakuza boss was attacked with the impulse of wanting to ask “Just what kind of experience it was that produced a brat like you”, based on his knowledge that Hajime was one of those “returnees”, but his instinct from his long life experience was raising a piercing alarm, so with effort he swallowed back his words.



Before long, the yakuza bunch bowed their heads simultaneously at Hajime before also speaking in chorus to Yue and the others 「All of you Nee-san, pardon us for bothering you in the middle of your enjoyment」, leaving behind that bizarre scene they finally drew back and left.



「Now then, it will be time soon, let’s go.」



Yue and the others stood from their chairs hearing Hajime’s words. When Hajime asked for the bill, the girl clerk around the same age as Hajime who had watched the exchange just now faced the register while saying 「Hyess! The bhill ishn’t hit! Thank you very mhucch!」 in a state that was really like the template that made him wonder if she was actually aiming for it.



However, the fact that this act wasn’t something intentional was made clear by the clerk’s finger barrage at the register buttons which looked like a certain kenpou master going「Aa~tatatatatatata-」 striking the secret points of the human body. It was like a clichéd template so much so that she looked pitiful. (TN: I guess this is a reference to Hokuto no Ken)



The girl clerk was looking for help from her coworkers and manager with a face that almost burst out crying, but they only clenched their fist to convey 「Do your best!」 without any sign of lending a hand. The other guests and the trio were, as expected, only giving support of 「Fight on!」 inside their hearts without any indication of giving assistance.



「……Haah」



「-!?」



Seeing the state of the clerk, Hajime sighed thinking whether this was his fault. Hearing that the clerk twitched and her body trembled, the girl clerk’s secret point strike (register machine only) was increasingly reaching further height.



Thereupon, on the hand of the girl clerk that was striking the secret point(register button) a lot, a small hand was piled up there. The clerk spontaneously screamed 「hih」, but when she understood that the hand came from the little girl Hajime was carrying she stared blankly in puzzlement.



Myuu smiled widely at that clerk.



「Clerk-san, it’s fine nano~」



「A, yes, my, my apologies.」



As expected from Myuu. It was with just one hit. The girl clerk who recovered her calm safely finished her divine fist training and typed on the register correctly.



Hajime who in a sense got his ass wiped for him patted on Myuu’s head with gratitude, admiration, and praise. Myuu was smiling “ehehe~” while embracing Hajime.



Settling the bill, the clerk prepared the change from the register and watched Myuu and Hajime who were like that, her gaze was attracted at Hajime’s unexpectedly gentle expression and gaze. And then, when Hajime whispered 「My bad for scaring you」 with a slightly troubled face while receiving the receipt, the clerk swung her head left and right energetically in denial.



Hajime exited the café while feeling the reproachful glare of the female camp on his back for some reason. The energetic voice of the clerk 「W, we are waiting, fo, for your next coming――!」 and the voice of the café manager that was trying to stop her from saying that echoed behind him.



「Hey, let’s go home already……I’m already, really at my limit in various meanings.」



「Yeah, me too. I want to go home.」



「The rumors were all true. I am convinced now. “That person” really had become a harem king to the greatest degree……」



A while after Hajime and group exited the café, the trio exited the café with a somewhat exhausted state. Their observation of Hajime’s group forced them to exhaustion in various meanings. At the same time, they also wordlessly convinced that it would be really bad if they stalked Hajime’s group any more than this.



And then, they turned the opposite direction from where Hajime and group were walking…… at that moment,



「Wapuh」



The face of one of the male student got covered by a paper that was carried by the wind with a plop. That male student cursed 「What the hell」 while taking that paper into his hand, he then dropped his gaze to that paper inadvertently……



――That young man stiffened as though he was frozen solid.



「Oi, what’s wrong?」



「What are you stiffening for……」



The other two felt dubious while they were peeking from both sides at the flying paper the stiffened young man kept holding, and there on the paper,



――Not a bad moment that you choose to quit. From now on too, be moderate with your inquisitiveness, okay? From senpai.



Naturally, the other two also stiffened. Since when were they noticed? When was this written? Rather, how did it arrive here? Eh, in the first place, just now, the wind was blowing right……



Various questions circulated in their brain instantly, then the three moved their heads *gigigi* with crude movements like machines that were forgotten to be oiled and faced each other. And then, a beat later,



「「「NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO-!!!!」」」



Screaming like a girl, the trio dashed on the path towards their homes like a startled rabbit.



In the following week, it went without saying that additional anecdotes were added into the urban legend of that “you-know-who”.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Next, I’m thinking of giving a spot to another two people while touching the commotion regarding post-returning home.





Chapter 184




Arifureta After – The Happy Road of a Certain Muscle Brain



AN: I’m sorry to those who are hoping for Aiko and Liliana, or the person with a faint shadow and the rabbit-eared onee-san, or perhaps the rabbit-eared ‘hyahha’ clan chief and the ‘Shia-tan haa haa’ perverted princess of the elves



Those are still in the middle of being written……



That place where tranquility was drifting as though separated from the outside world, was a graveyard at a certain outskirt of town. The main building of a temple could be seen a slight distance away, and several gravestones lining up regularly were in the surroundings.



In such a graveyard that was characteristically quiet, in addition to it being a holiday, unusually there was a figure of a young girl there. She was standing alone by herself. Her hair that was reaching her back was fluttering from the breeze. She wasn’t stirring even for a bit as though her thoughts were running around in her head while staring fixedly at the family name engraved on the gravestone.



But, at that timing, a rough voice resounded along with heavy footsteps that broke the tranquility.



「Ou, Suzu. What a coincidence. So you also came here huh.」



「Ryutaro-kun!」



The girl――Suzu turned back in surprise. Ryutaro who had just arrived stamped his feet loudly on the gravel path of the graveyard while raising his hand and greeted 「Yo」 really nonchalantly.



「Ryutaro-kun. Why are you here……wait, there is only one thing to do here huh.」



「Yeah, today is the day everyone is gathering. ……So, for some reason, yeah. If we did not come here, then no one would come here.」



「That’s not true you know? At least, there was already an offering when I came here.」



「Hm? Aa, by any chance, Kaori and Shizuku perhaps?」



「Maybe.」



In front of the gravestone, there were indeed some flowers decorating it there. There were also flowers decorating the spot other than the flowers that Suzu brought. Suzu was giving her agreement to Ryutaro’s guess while opening her mouth with a wry smile.



「……Although, there is not really anything of Eri inside here.」



Saying that Suzu returned her gaze to the gravestone. There, the name of “Nakamura Eri” was engraved. Yes, the friend of Suzu that met her end in another world――Nakamura Eri’s family tomb was located here. Of course, Eri had self-exploded in the [Holy Precincts], so, let alone her remains, there wasn’t anything of her in this grave. There was nothing to prove that Eri was sleeping in here.



Even so, when she wished to lament over her best friend who devoted herself to evil due to her unstoppable madness and feelings, Suzu’s feet would naturally bring herself to this place. After they returned from the other world, she had only visited this place once. On this day after a year passed, when the members who had gone through a unique experience would gather, before the promised time Suzu and also Ryutaro without even any planning beforehand……including Kaori and Shizuku who came here beforehand, their feelings were as one.



For a while, the two stayed silent, they only continued to stare at the gravestone without any word, while recalling the Eri of before they were sent to the other side.



It was unknown how much time passed, but before long Suzu stretched her body with a groan ‘uu~n’, she floated a soft smile as though she had sorted out her feelings while asking Ryutaro.



「Come to think of it, as expected, Kouki won’t come to the gathering today, will he?」



「Yeah. Especially because I didn’t hear anything from Nagumo about opening the gate. Guess he won’t participate. Well, even though we finally got a special class prepared for our sake after much effort, he went as far as leaving high school, going to Tortus saying “I’m going to atone”. Something like the gathering for celebrating the one year of our return, even if that guy was on this side he absolutely wouldn’t attend it, yeah.」



「I guess. Kouki-kun would say something like, 『I don’t have any qualification for that』, right?」



Ryutaro and Suzu smiled wryly at each other.



Exactly as they said, currently Kouki was on Tortus. Kouki had returned home to earth once together with Hajime and the others, but he was unable to make himself to go through normal high school life. It wasn’t like anyone was saying anything harsh to him, but it was his own heart, his guilty feelings, his will that wished for atonement, that rejected to spend his time with carefree feelings in school life even if it was just for one or two years.



Even with the disappearance of Ehitorujue who was toying around with people with his war game, it didn’t mean that the threat of monsters had decreased. Among the monsters that came out from 【Holy Precincts】, there should be some of them that succeeded in escaping. It seemed that removing those threats even for a bit was one kind of atonement for Kouki.



Naturally, it was widely known that Kouki, who should have been summoned as a hero, didn’t participate in the decisive battle. There was also Kouki’s personal declaration which made it highly known throughout Tortus how Kouki was on the enemy’s side. Therefore, that equally meant that there was no place for Kouki in that world.



But, even so, as a single adventurer, Kouki silently moved busily to be of assistance to someone.



「So there is still a little bit of time until the time, but what will Suzu do?」



「Hmm~. I don’t really have any plans though. Maybe just strolling around aimlessly, or meeting up with Kaorin and the others……no, I won’t meet up with them I guess. It’s impossible to spend my time normally inside that pink atmosphere. It would be absolutely tiresome.」



「Aa~, yeah. I guess so. Then, how about you kill time aimlessly. Together with me.」



「Yep. Let’s talk about various things, mixed with flashback scenes too for the readers.」



「……」



Suzu was receiving a bit of a wave signal while the two of them stared at the gravestone one more time, and then they left that place. (TN: What it means by the signal here is how Suzu is breaking the fourth wall a bit.)



The pair who were walking around aimlessly while making small talk, before long reached a cozy park. Without any particular confirmation about each other’s thoughts or any previous agreement, the pair naturally sat down on a bench. There they stared at the figures of children who were playing in the public park.



「Aa~, it’s so peacefuul~」



「Oi oi, what are you doing speaking like that. Are you a grandma?」



「That’s cruel. You really are a muscle brain without delicacy like usual, good grief. Even Ryutaro-kun, you would also impulsively think like that sometimes since we returned here, right? About how peaceful it is here. To think that until a year ago we were fighting a battle where it wouldn’t be strange to die anytime, this is a bit unbelievable even for myself.」



「……Yeah. When we first returned here we were busy with things, so I didn’t feel anything like that though. But indeed, recently, now that I have calmed down I often get thoughts like that.」



「……Isn’t that right.」



A year ago Hajime created a gate that connected the other world, Tortus, and earth, and the surviving classmates once more stepped their feet on this birthplace of theirs.



They landed on the rooftop of the school, then they looked around and raised a loud joyful voice at the moonlight night. Among them there were people who were overcome with emotions and broke out crying, there were also those who were consoling those people while crying in sympathy. At that time it was quite a hectic situation.



At that time, Hajime and the others also investigated the possibility, whether in the end, it would be possible to once again open the gate to Tortus, the other world, from here or not. Hajime had consumed an immense amount of magic power, but he used the magic crystals, where he stocked reserve magic power, and whipped up his tired body to immediately attempt it. The result was that they confirmed that, at the very least, even on earth they were able to use magic and artifacts.



Hearing that, the happiness of the classmates who realized that it was possible to once again meet with the people that they had created close ties with in the other world rose to a great extent. All of the classmates swooped down on Hajime and they even did the customary practice of tossing him into the air even though it was in the middle of the night.



After that, the calming down classmates rejoiced in each other’s survival and return before setting out to return to their homes. In the end, what happened with their houses and families……such anxiety was by no means nonexistence in their hearts, but even so, all of them were dashing through their school route with light footsteps and nostalgia,……with a super speed that would make an Olympic athlete go pale. 「You guys-, stop jumping over the rooftops!」 it went without saying that the angry voice of a certain worrier ponytail-san echoed in the middle of the night.



By the way, regarding how they should explain to their families and other people regarding the events during their disappearance, during the month after the decisive battle they all discussed it, and the conclusion they reached was to “tell it honestly”.



Even if they made lies that sounded realistic, surely if it got investigated by the police and so forth, the contradiction and the suspiciousness of their lies would be exposed. It was easily imaginable how popular the topic of a group disappearance at midday would become and how earnest the police would investigate it. There was no way that those police that were investigating it wouldn’t be able to see through their half-baked lies. To say nothing of how there were students who couldn’t come back. They couldn’t do this half-baked.



Having said that, if they tried to pretend to have amnesia, it would look like they really had something to hide and the police and mass media would surely not leave them alone. A blank period that the disappeared students were obstinately refusing to speak about……something like that was just the favorite of the mass media. Combined with the students who did not return, there would be many sides that would make a great fuss with the mixture of facts and truths.



If the situation would be like that, then wouldn’t it be better if they offered by themselves that kind of information instead, something that would make the surrounding spontaneously draw away in revulsion, or possibly make other people look at them with pitying gazes while secretly distancing themselves.



The information they offered would be,



――We fought monsters and an evil god, in a fantasy world of swords and magic!



Like that.



Of course, this was an idea from Hajime. There was not a single lie in that statement, that was why they could just act boldly saying that no matter how much they were pressed for information. In this way, even the classmates who weren’t as shameless as Hajime could weather the storm without amassing too much anxiety. And no matter what other people said to them, they could just speak back with “It depends on you whether you believe it or not”.



And then, regarding the people who would still pursue the matter deeply even then, or when some kind of problem occurred, Yue-san’s magic would be liberally used to get those problematic people to be “Dear me, what was I doing again just now?”



Also, the people who were applied with “Dear me, what was I doing again just now?” weren’t just the mass media whose tenacity status was at MAX count and the excessively sharp government officials or police. There were also suspicious organizations that seemed to be related with religion, or ree-ally suspicious people that seemed to be related with the government, or the absurdly suspicious sorcery――occultist group.



While the majority of their classmates were enjoying television or internet while nibbling at potato chips after so long, behind the scenes Hajime and the others (+ a person with a thin shadow) were doing this and that against the bunch who seemed to be living behind the scenes of the Earth but……that was another story.



「In the beginning, it was really hectic wasn’t it. Especially the mass media people, they were really persistent huh.」



「Yeah, many calls were coming asking me to come out in a special program on television, or something like that. The times when I was asked about Eri or Hiyama, “Why is it only you all who came home?”, or “Don’t you feel any responsibility?”, I seriously wanted to send them flying y’know.」



「About that huh. When Nakano-kun and Saitou-kun normally punched the reporter, they got an article 『As expected, is there any disorder in their minds!?』 in the news without any reservation at all you remember?」



「The delicacy of the reporter is also questionable though.」



Recalling the large wave in society at that time, Suzu and Ryutaro smiled wryly at each other. At that time, not only the mass media and police, even some of their acquaintances visited them to pry about just what really happened.



Especially the families of Hiyama, Kondo, and Shimizu. They were doggedly hounding the matter until the end.



The truth was also conveyed without anything hidden toward the families of the students who couldn’t return. The ones who were doing the explanation were Aiko and Hajime. Actually Aiko tried to go to talk to those families by herself, but the topic about Hajime would be unavoidable anyway if the truth was going to be spoken, and above all, Hajime didn’t have the least bit of intention to bother Aiko or make Aiko bear the full brunt regarding the matter of Hiyama and the others, so Hajime forcefully accompanied Aiko in the end.



Naturally, after those families were made to believe the story of another world by showing them magic, the families of Hiyama and the others cursed and insulted Hajime and Aiko in unconcealed rage and hatred, some were even trying to act violent, but……



Giving a glance at Aiko who resigned herself to accept that anger and hatred from her feeling of responsibility of being unable to bring those students back home or reforming their conduct, Hajime who was the perpetrator that put the bullet on those students kept a cold expression and repelled all of that anger and hatred straight from the front.



Even if the families of those killed students were virtuous, no matter how much those families were looking forward to the return of their children, those things weren’t something that could erase the fact that they had bared their fang towards Hajime and Hajime’s important people. For the feeling of a parent, something like what their child did and Hajime’s circumstance were irrelevant. But similar to that, for Hajime, something like the feeling of his enemy’s parent was also something that had nothing to do with him.



――I don’t have any regret for what I did. I don’t even think that what I did was wrong. Therefore, I won’t even apologize. You can think of me however you like, but if you turn your hand at my relatives because of this case then you better prepare yourself.



Those were the words that Hajime spoke to those families. For Hajime who was skilled in subtle deception and speech, to the degree that he was said to possess talent as an agitator, those were really straight-forward words that could even be said to be tactless. To put it bluntly, those words could only be thought of as something that rubbed the nerves of the other party the wrong way.



But, Aiko who was beside him was able to understand that for Hajime those words were his greatest sincerity, those were his resolve. He didn’t deceive the other party, and he was resolved that if the hatred that he caused would try to lay their wicked hands on his relatives, then he would face it anywhere, anytime, and eliminate them.



As the result, Hiyama’s family acted rashly trying to get revenge on Hajime and the others. Hajime personally broke their hearts. The other families who knew of the state of Hiyama’s family then protected their silence. Seen from the side, it was really a result that left a bad aftertaste in their mouth, but Hajime didn’t care for it at all.



Now then, including those commotions too, there were also things like the raging journalism battle and whatever that was perpetrated regarding the ‘returnees’ but……one day, all of those suddenly died down like a drawing back sea wave. And it didn’t stop there, all of the news was quietly dying down so unnaturally until it was like nothing had happened at all.



「About that, there is no doubt that was something Nagumo-kun and the others did, isn’t it?」



「For sure. Problems like the family register of Yue-san and the others, or the recognition of the surroundings, those kinds of problems were also all easily cleared. It wasn’t something strange at all if they actually did something somehow regarding the awareness of the society while they were at it, yeah. Not to mention how Ai-chan-sensei was made to bear the full brunt of the critic because she was the only adult involved. Ain’t no way that Nagumo was gonna just leave that going on.」



Actually what happened was exactly like that. 「When magic is mixed with information society……something like the world becomes simple, huh」, if it was asked who was the one that was saying such extremely terrifying things……it should be rather left unsaid.



「Well, there were a lot of troubles, but if there is a small mercy from all that, is that no one got rejected by their families I think. My Otou-san and Okaa-san, also Taeko-san(the caretaker) too, right after I finished giving them the explanation, their faces turned grim and they tried to bring me to a hospital, but after I actually showed them magic and explained several times they somehow could accept it.」



「Yeah, me too. But, in my case, I showed them my Mode Werewolf so……they became really panicked at that time. My mother fainted, while my old man took out a bat that he swung around wildly, big sis wet herself, and Karashio(pet dog) howled like crazy, and my neighbor old man Fujii said things like 『It’s waaar~』 while shooting out the fire extinguisher……」



「I don’t know about that old man you mentioned last, but most of it was Ryutaro-kun’s own fault, wasn’t it? Rather, your father who tried to face his son that suddenly transformed into a werewolf using a bat, I really respect him from my heart now.」



Receiving Suzu’s exasperated gaze that came from the bottom of her heart, Ryutaro said「That was an accident, an accident」 while averting his gaze in embarrassment. By the way, Ryutaro who thought that he wouldn’t be able to calm the situation by himself at that time made his family and the neighbor old man Fujii to faint for the time being, and then by going all out with the instant movement of a werewolf, he intruded into the house of Kouki who was similarly in the middle of explaining the circumstances.



When a brutal werewolf of a fantasy world suddenly leaped into their house, Kouki’s father fainted, while the mother took out a kitchen knife and went into a rampage, and Kouki’s little sister peed herself. Kouki who immediately guessed the true identity of the werewolf and that his objective was to ask for help, at that time he suppressed his mother for the time being and made his little sister to sleep.



And then he punched Ryutaro, after that even while sighing deeply, thinking that it was just the right timing with all the chaos that had happened, he held a double family meeting along with Ryutaro’s family that had been wakened up and somehow obtained the understanding from both families.



By the way, at Shizuku’s home, there was also an emergency call that came from the Shirasaki family. At that time, the first voice that came from Kaori’s parent that was filled with confusion was 『Shizuku-chan! As I thought, you have come home too then, I’m glad! By the way, my daughter is an angel now, do you know anything about it!?』, like that. It seemed that Kaori showed her parents her angel mode but……listening to it normally, that call could only be heard as a doting parent suddenly calling in the middle of the night boasting about his daughter.



On the other side of the phone, the voice of Kaori saying 「Geez-, Otou-san! Don’t make embarrassing calls like that!」 could be heard, then next came the voice 「But, but Kaoriii. Tha, that angel look……that’s just too lovely!」, such hectic conversation of parent and child could be heard noisily……Shizuku silently put down the phone. While inside her heart, 「I’m also busy explaining over here, idiooot!」 she was cursing.



Like that, the classmates who accomplished returning home each went through different twists and turns to persuade their families, however, in the end, they were able to make their families believe their story about the other world, and together with their families, they dealt with the mass media as planned.



Although, it wasn’t like everything went as planned, or everything was still the same like before……



「Eh? Suzu-chan? Also Sakagami? What are you two doing in this kind of place?」



「Oh, it’s true. Suzu-chan, long time no see~! Wait, don’t tell me, this is a date!?」



「Eh? Lies!? With Sakagami!? Suzu-chan, are you being threatened!?」



Suddenly noisy voices called out to Ryutaro and Suzu who were talking on a park bench. When they looked, there were their former classmates standing there. There were three girls who on that day when they were summoned went to a different place during the lunch break. Because of that, they didn’t get dragged into the summoning. They were friends of Suzu who were relatively close to her.



The three of them saw Suzu spending time with only Ryutaro. It stirred up a bit of curiosity about the relationship between the two and great wariness towards Ryutaro inside their mind, but when Suzu replied that they had planned to join up with everyone else after this and currently they were killing time until the planned time, the expression of the three girls loosened in disappointment and relieve.



They talked noncommittally a bit about their recent condition, and then after exchanging the speech of let’s contact each other again next time~, they parted ways.



「As usual, your communication prowess is high, eh.」



「I guess.」



Ryutaro’s words that were mixed with praise was accepted by Suzu with a shrug, not looking like she was being humble or joking. As expected, it seemed that the decisive battle against Eri that Suzu went through caused a great change, or perhaps a great growth in Suzu’s mind.



Group disappearance――that fact also had a not so little, no, rather it had a big impact on the other students of the same school. The students’ attitudes and atmosphere towards the ‘returnee’ group were as though they were tumors that must not be touched and a group that they didn’t really want to have anything to do with, but in reverse, they were also lacking in delicacy with their curiosity.



Also, when the ‘returnees’ were attending school once more, there were a lot of families that contacted the school and voiced their anxiety about them.



During that one year of disappearance, there was no contact at all from the disappearing group. Other people didn’t understand where they were and what they were doing or what was done to them. The ‘returnees’ themselves only gave a story that didn’t sound realistic at all. Furthermore, there were also students who didn’t come back with them……sure enough, the families were concerned whether their child would be okay going to the same school together with such a mysterious group.



As a result, regardless of the return of the directly related people, the truth of the case was still not clear. There was also the matter of the students whose whereabouts were still unknown, so finally, the school administration moved.



In order to reduce situations where Hajime and the others got exposed to the inquisitive eyes of society, an exclusive curriculum was prepared in order for the ‘returnees’ to recover their falling behind in their studies, at the same time psychologist were stationed inside the school for supporting the smooth school life of the ‘returnees’……with that official stance, a special class that was separated from other students in order to avoid troublesome problems was prepared.



Because of that, currently, the ‘returnees’ weren’t studying in their original classroom but were now put in a fixed class until their graduation that was located on the top floor of the school. Furthermore, it was at the corner in an unused room.



Actually, a talk of changing the school of the ‘returnees’ itself was strongly raised but……with the opinion of someone that said 「It’s troublesome to change schools」 along with profoundly mysterious phenomena, the creation of this special class was pushed through. The class was formed unnoticed but very naturally. To the degree that it was unnatural……



Anyway, a physical sense of distance between the ‘returnees’ and the other students was created. Naturally, a sense of distance was also spreading between the ‘returnees’ and the students of different classes who they were friends with before the summoning, however, there were also a lot among them who managed to remake their friendly relationships but……even amidst those people, Suzu was the one who was the most adept in building back a relationship with the friends she already had before the summoning into a relationship that was the same like before, no, rather that relationship became even more intimate than before.



That relationship was to the degree that when Suzu met those friends accidentally on a holiday like this, those friends would call to her proactively. It was to the degree that they even glared at Ryutaro with gleaming eyes that were unbecoming for a girl, as though to say ‘If you do something strange to Suzu, don’t expect it to end well for you’.



「Haah, good grief, someone like you really is…… If Nagumo is excluded, surely the one who changed the most by going to the other world is Suzu. It’s an honor to be seen as a boyfriend even though it was only for a moment yeah.」



「Fu-fu-fu. Isn’t that right, isn’t that right. For Ryutaro-kun to be suspected of having a relationship with a beautiful woman like this, you happy man you~」



「……」



「……Oi, try to say the reason why you averted your eyes when I said the words beautiful woman. If you have an objection to my words then how about saying it loudly. Hmm?」



Taniguchi Suzu. Looking from her braided hair that stretched long and the atmosphere she was clad in, she was a girl that looked really adult like. However, the sad thing was……that her height didn’t stretch up for even a millimeter. And then, her breasts were also……. No matter how one looked at her, it was hard to call her a beautiful woman. However, surely she was a beautiful girl. Perhaps, undoubtedly.



Seeing Suzu who was indignant at his attitude, Ryutaro lifted up both his hands and showed a pose of surrendering. And then, seeing Suzu who expressed her displeasure with a huff, Ryutaro was thinking of what to do, what should he do in hesitation, wherein the end he showed an embarrassed gesture and averted his gaze quickly while opening his mouth.



「No, well, that’s……you are, charming enough y’know? No, really, I’m serious.」



「Thank you very much, for the faked follow up. Hmph, I’m not a super beauty like Yue-san and the others anyway.」



Suzu went 「keh」 with her lips pouted looking somewhat timid in an inferiority complex. But, Ryutaro’s words after that which were said with a shockingly serious voice to her, caused her to leak out a dumbfounded voice unintentionally.



「……That ain’t a mere follow up. Suzu is a good woman, who won’t lose to anyone.」



「Eh?」



When Suzu reflexively turned her gaze at Ryutaro, Ryutaro who was supposedly looking away until just now was staring straight at Suzu. The small sound of her heart jumping inside her chest resounded. Suzu understood how her neck and her face was turning feverish.



This time, it was Suzu who was looking aside. For some reason, she couldn’t let out any words. She could only barely let out the sound 「H, hm~m」 that sounded ambiguous even for herself.



A strangely stained atmosphere that Suzu had never really experienced before was flowing, she couldn’t say anything. Both of them were wordless, only the sounds of leaves rustling from the wind were entering their ears excessively clearly.



Stealing a glance, Suzu tried to peep at Ryutaro’s state. There he was looking really nervous, and yet his face was really serious and seemed to be troubled by something. That also caused Suzu’s nervous meter to climb up without stopping.



Before long, with a calm voice as though he had resolved himself, Ryutaro opened his mouth.



「About the matter after we graduate high school……」



「Eh!? Ah, um……」



「I, am thinking of going to Tortus again.」



「That’s……you mean not in the capacity of going there to play together with Nagumo-kun and the others?」



「Yeah. I’m thinking, of living in the world there.」



「……」



Suzu felt like she understood the reason for Ryutaro deciding that. In this one year, they had spent much time together. During that time they talked about various things that made her think about whether he would do something like that.



「I want to help Kouki there, I also want to be able to help guys in need. I have the power for that. Ain’t no way after this late I can become a salaryman or something with all this.」



「Didn’t you, also think about being a police officer before this?」



「Yeah. But see, as I thought, my nature suits the world over there more.」



「I see.」



It appeared that Ryutaro had genuinely decided his future path. Suzu felt like she was going to get left behind somehow, that her feelings turned a bit lonely.



Towards such Suzu, Ryutaro suddenly stood up, he then moved in front of Suzu and got down on his one knee. With his stance now, the large built Ryutaro was looking up at her. This was as though……



Suzu’s body temperature was rising. Her heart jumped from Ryutaro’s serious expression.



「Ryu, Ryutaro-kun……」



‘What are you doing?’ Suzu was about to voice that but, Ryutaro conferred all his feelings with his words faster than Suzu.



「Suzu. Won’t you, come together with me?」



「Tha, that is, are you asking me to form a party with you sometimes――」



「That ain’t it. You got what I meant, right? What I am saying is, for “the whole life”.」



「ts……」



Suzu gulped. That was exactly, a love confession. For the first time in her life, a confession with seriousness to the highest degree was right now said to her. The winding of great emotions that were welling up inside her made her voice get caught in her throat that she couldn’t say anything. Ryutaro spoke his words further to such Suzu.



「I love Suzu. Rather than a future in this world, pick a future that is together with me. It won’t be a calm future but I will treasure you with all my power. Let’s go, together. Forever.」



Inside Suzu’s heart, something like 「That’s too straight!」, or 「Even though you had come to a clean break but even temporarily you once fell in love with Yue-san, do you have a preference for small girls!? You lolicon!」, or 「While saying you love me, you are asking me to fight together in another world, just what are you saying you muscle brain!」, those abusive languages were lining up inside Suzu’s stormy heart but……



When she noticed, a reply of――



「……Mm. That’s fine.」



That sentence came out naturally. The words came out so smoothly that it surprised even herself. Like that, she became aware.



「Even myself am surprised, but I too, seem to really like Ryutaro-kun.」



Suzu’s face was already looking like a ripe apple. The time they ran around in another world, this one year since they came home, the things that she had piled up between her and Ryutaro seemed to have grown bigger than what Suzu was aware of.



Like that, Ryutaro who received a confession acceptance for the first time in his life, and obtained the word “like” from a girl was……



――UosSHAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA-



He howled grandly like that. The children who played in some distance jumped from shock and they looked at Ryutaro while shaking.



「Wai-, you are noisy, Ryutaro-kun! The small kids are making faces like a villager that is encountering an ogre there!」



「A-ha-ha-ha, then how about I use Mode Ogre then! If it’s now then I’ll give special service yeah!」



「Don’t do that! A Monster Appeared at a Park in Broad Daylight! The front page of the evening paper today will be like that! Or rather, how happy are you? Your tension is too high!」



「Obviously I’m happy! It’s about my first girlfriend in my life! Furthermore, it’s Suzu! This is the best!」



「-, uu, idiottt~~」



After that, a muscle brain’s greatest happiness cheer was booming in the small public park for a while, together with the remonstrating voice of Suzu who even then couldn’t hide the happiness inside herself.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Even though I can imagine a ton of realistic problems waiting after returning home from another world, I cannot think of any stylish solution, and relied on magic in the end. Please forgive this poor brain of Shirakome.



However……something like the transmission of brainwashing magic through the internet using age of god magic, or transmission of subliminal effects using television……I think those are just plain terrifying.



Perhaps Shirakome is unable to leave the PC today too is because……





Chapter 185




Arifureta After – The Gathering of the Returnees



Inside the restaurant that was illuminated by a warm orange light, although the atmosphere wasn’t that of a high-class restaurant, it was filled by a chic and calming atmosphere.



That famous restaurant that would be almost fully occupied on the holiday when the evening came had not even a single guest today, it was completely empty.



「Yuuka, it will be time soon, right? Nana-chan and Taeko-chan too, it’s fine to stop already.」



「Is that so? Then let’s stop around here.」



One of the returnees, Sonobe Yuuka said that and took off her apron. Following her, Miyasaki Nana and Sugawara Taeko also took a breath ‘sigh’ while taking off their aprons.



The one who spoke to Yuuka was the owner of this restaurant, at the same time he was also the father of Yuuka, Sonobe Hiroshi. The mother, Sonobe Yuuri, was also standing at his side. Yes, this restaurant was the western style restaurant that the Sonobe family was managing.



Hiroshi was making her daughter and her two friends that were helping out to stop at this period of time around five o’clock in the evening that originally would be busy for the restaurant because this restaurant would be the gathering place for the one year anniversary of Hajime and the others’ return. Yuuka and her two friends were only helping until the appointed time.



There was around fifteen more minutes until the arranged time. ‘Somebody should be coming soon’, it was at that time when Yuuka was beginning to think that that the door of the restaurant opened with a good timing.



「Yo. By any chance, I’m the first one here?」



The one who was saying that while entering inside was Tamai Atsushi. Behind him, Aikawa Noboru and Nimura Akiro were also entering while giving a similar greeting.



「That’s right. For you three to arrive fifteen minutes early, how admirable.」



「Haha, my stomach is empty here from playing since the afternoon. Can you give me something like a snack or anything for the time being?」



「Look here, the party will start soon enough, so please be patient.」



It appeared that Atsushi and others were starving. It seemed they were playing through the afternoon until this time. Hearing what Yuuka said, they grumbled「Eee~」while going to sit at the reserved seat.



Thereupon,



「Excuse me……I think it’s me who came first though.」



「Uoo!? What the!?」



「E, Endo! So you are here!?」



「Eh, lies. Since when were you here!?」



「Even though I didn’t hear the bell clinking!」



In fact, it seemed the one who arrived first was the man with a shadow so thin even an apostle of god overlooked him――Endo Kousuke. Kousuke was responding「I came in normally, gave a normal greeting, and normally took a seat, that’s all you know?」with a faraway look, hearing that Yuuka and the others spoke words of apology and consolation with an awkward look.



Atsushi and the others took their seats while speaking to Kousuke.



「Nevertheless you are really early huh. You aren’t with Nagayama and the others today?」



「Recently I am not really together with them after all. It seems that Juugo and Kentaro are going out playing with Tsuji-san’s group but……as for me, I was studying.」



Yuuka nodded in understanding after hearing Kousuke’s answer.



「Now that you mentioned it, Endo-kun, you are aiming to become a doctor, isn’t it? And then when you graduate you are going to migrate to the other side, aren’t you?」



「The beastmen like Rana-san and the others of the Hauria clan cannot use healing magic, so it is for their sake you are learning modern medical techniques, aren’t you? Even though it’s not actually a long distance relationship, but you are really going that far huh.」



Exactly as Nana said, Kousuke who publicly got a rabbit ear onee-san lover in Tortus was studying hard aiming for a medical university, in order to learn the modern medical technique――that was to say, a healing technique that didn’t use magic medicine or healing magic, so that he could become a strength for the Hauria clan even for a bit in the future. Other than that, he was also learning various things extensively to polish his own assassination skills, like army hand-to-hand fighting technique or survival skills, and then also other knowledge like agriculture techniques to negotiating techniques, which made him greatly busy. He was doing all of that, for the sake of his beloved lover.



Although during this one year it felt like his character as a man with a thin shadow was crumbling, he got dragged into this and that behind the scenes of the world, chased after by troublesome people (several people among them were girls)……in a sense, he was the one who got totally immersed at the world behind the scene more than anyone of the returnee group, which made the person himself to be at his wits end.



Looking at Kousuke who was having a faraway look, with a lukewarm gaze Yuuka and the others sent a yell to their classmate who was doing his best day and night. While calling the name that was the proof of Kousuke being welcomed into the Hauria clan as a new family.



「「「「「「Kousuke E Abyssgate-kun, do your best.」」」」」」



「Stop it! I told you guys already to not use that name when there is no Hauria clan beside me, right!?」



The great shame caused Kousuke to suddenly cover his face with both hands and he fell prostrated on the table. It was a name that was given by a beautiful onee-san, so it was a wonder just where was the need of feeling shame from that. Even though he was the great man who was introducing himself with that name while earning the most kill points at the legendary great war with the apostles as the opponent.



「Oi oi, what’s the matter, Abyssgate-san. Is your body feeling unwell, Abyssgate-san.」



「Doesn’t Abyssgate sound cool, Abyssgate. Didn’t the people of the Hauria clan welcome you greatly, Abyssgate.」



Atsushi and Yuuka were grinning widely while poking at Kousuke from both sides. Kousuke was holding his head while pleading「Stooop, stop it already!」, but



「Kousuke E Abyssgate, has arrived!」



「Fuh, so you cannot see me? Obviously. I who am lurking in darkness cannot be caught by anyone……」



「The name of Shippuu Kagetsume, engrave it in that body!」(TN: Gale Shadow Claw)



When Noboru said that in high spirits, Nana continued after him in the same spirit, then next even Akito took a pose while reproducing how Kousuke once was. The health point of Kousuke’s heart was plunging into the red zone. Taeko was earnestly shaking *puru puru* at the shoulders while averting his gaze.



But, at that timing, a voice that sounded as though it was shaking from Kousuke’s disastrous condition, filled with sympathy from the bottom of the speaker’s heart, such voice was resounding.



「You guys……doing something like that. There is a limit even in being nasty. Just what are you doing to Endo huh.」



「Na, Nagumooo! My kindred spirit! So you finally came!」



Looking at the direction of the voice, having entered the restaurant unnoticed, the group of Hajime’s had approached until they were right beside Kousuke and the others. Kousuke energetically dashed at Hajime while half-crying. And then, he hid behind Hajime while raising a voice of counterattack at Atsushi and the others.



「You lot-, saying anything you like wretchedly like that! Just look, at this real harem man! And then recall it, the Nagumo of before! Just what do you think the Hauria clan is calling this guy! Don’t you know that it overshadowed someone like!? No, I am not speaking about my naturally thin shadow here you know? Nagumo’s chuunib――」



*bechikon-* A crack resounded, then Endo went through a triple mid-air spin until he crumbled down from both legs.



「……Just now, why did you hit me?」



「……Sorry. I wanted to do that for some reason.」



When Endo calmly asked with teary eyes, Hajime answered awkwardly while averting his eyes. Both of them had mutually received nicknames from the Hauria with gratitude(?), being equally a victim when those nicknames were spread grandly throughout the world, together with their activity at the world behind the scene in this one year, the two of them were actually in quite a good relationship. Feeling sympathy at each other’s pain of heart and also their close affinity from both having lovers of a female of the Hauria clan was also the reason for that good relationship.



「Yuuka-san, thank you for lending your restaurant for today. Is there something that I can help with, like cooking or something?」



「It’s fine Shia-san. Most of it is finished already with me and Nana and Tae, Otou-san and Okaa-san are also in high spirit.」



Yuuka shook her head at Shia’s offer with a smile. And exactly as Yuuka said, Hiroshi who caught sight of Hajime’s figure rested his hands and approached Hajime.



「Yaa, Hajime-kun. Welcome to my restaurant. I was thinking of inviting you all someday to here you know.」



「Much obliged for today. Letting us reserve the whole restaurant……that saved us some trouble. Even if we have the gathering at another place, if there are other people then we are going to become a target of curiosity.」



「No no, something like this is nothing much. ……You are the person who brought our daughter back home. Just something like this won’t even be enough for thanks. The most that I can do is only to let you all enjoy our family’s prided cooking to your fill, but I have put all my skill into this just so you know. Have fun to your heart’s content.」



「Yes, I had also heard from Endo and Tamai how delicious the food here is, so I’ll look forward to it.」



Seeing Hajime who was exchanging words really politely with Yuuka’s father, Atsushi and the others whispered to each other things like「As I thought, hearing Nagumo use polite language really feels wrong ain’t it」, or「Demon king-sama has also mellowed out huh」, or「Well, as expected, suddenly pulling out a gun in Japan is just impossible. Naturally, he is going to mellow out like that」, or「No no, Sugawara. We still don’t know that. If it’s Nagumo, something like hiding the evidence is as easy as turning his palm you know? The possibility that he has already killed several people is……」.



The “Treasure Warehouse” that was fixed on Hajime’s left ring finger faintly shined. Sensing that Hajime was feeling like taking out something from the infinite armory, Atsushi and others instantly sat back in their chairs and drank their drinks with an atmosphere that was shamelessly relaxed. It seemed that they had been trained in the way of dealing with Hajime.



「Nevertheless, the wives of Hajime-kun are really all beautiful isn’t it.」



From behind Hiroshi, Yuuri approached while wiping her hand on her apron, she was saying such a thing and continued with a greeting「Welcome for today. Feel free to relax here」. Then Yue and others each gave her the greeting while expressing their thanks for lending the restaurant.



Yuuri floated a friendly smile at Yue and others, and then she nodded as though she had comprehended something before turning back her gaze at Hajime, and said a sentence,



「So, I wonder, when will Hajime-kun take Yuuka as your wife too?」



「Wai-, Okaa-san!? What are you saying!?」



The words of her mother that were suddenly let out caused Yuuka to spit out her drink *bufu-* while she raised her voice. Looking at that direction, Atsushi and co, Kaori, and also Shizuku were looking taken aback and they turned their gaze at Yuuri, and then their awareness turned toward Yuuka.



On the other hand, Yuuri who suddenly dropped that bomb was chuckling while saying thing like「Is that no good I wonder? Okaa-san is just thinking, that if it’s Hajime-kun then there won’t be any problem at all though~」.



The mother of Yuuka looked relatively gentle and calm, but it seemed that she was a type of person who would drop a bomb unconsciously. Yuuka ignored her mother that was like that and then she turned to Hajime in order to make an excuse……but her expression grandly cramped after seeing the widely smiling face of Kaori who was right before her eyes.



「E, err, Kaori-chan? You see, I――」



「It’s fine, it’s fine you know, Yuuka-chan. I pro~perly understand after all. Anyway, how about going to the seat at the back for the time being? Because if you want to be at Hajime-kun’s side, then there will be various things that I want you to know beforehand, so I’m going to teach you slowly.」



「No no no no, I’ll hold back from that! It’s not like I really need to know that!」



「Muu, by that, are you saying that something like the matter of Hajime-kun is trivial I wonder? I wonder?」



「Troublesome-. I have thought this since before, but when it is related to Nagumo-kun, Kaori-chan is troublesome-」



「I won’t get tricked even with you saying that! Now, Yuuka-chan, let’s talk?」



Saying that Kaori dragged the resisting Yuuka with her hands gripping Yuuka’s shoulders and she took her to the seat at the back. While being dragged, Yuuka sent a gaze that was asking for help at Atsushi and others, but with splendid synchronization, everyone averted their eyes. Yuuka was in despair!



「Haa, Hajime. I’m worried about Yuuka, that’s why I too will be at the seat in the back for a while.」



「Yeah, I’ll leave Kaori to you. Help Sonobe before her soul is slipping out from her mouth.」



「Roger.」



Even after a year passed since their return, Shizuku’s worrying habit didn’t change. Although, currently she had the lover who would give her the reward after her worrying, so it seemed that it wasn’t a hardship for her at all. (TN: In the raw, the worrying habit implied that Shizuku was worrying for others, not herself, and she would go to great length to help the other party from their trouble even without them asking her. Anyone know a good word to express someone like this?)



Like that, while complicated noisiness could be heard from the back, the classmates of the returnee group were arriving one after another.



Nagayama Juugo and Nomura Kentarou, Tsuji Ayako, Yoshino Mao, the former Nagayama party. After that, with Nakano Shinji and Saitou Yoshiki as first on the list, almost all of the returnee students had gathered.



The ones who still hadn’t arrived in the invitation today were Ryutaro and Suzu, and Aiko. Everyone knew about Kouki being in Tortus, so there was no need to wait for him. Also, Aiko would be late because of her work and she had let them knew beforehand, so in actuality, there were only Ryutaro and Suzu left.



「It’s already past the agreed time……」



Hajime looked at the clock and whispered that. The clock had certainly turned to five o’clock in the afternoon. On the table, there wasn’t only the standard western food, there were also small snacks like fried potato, karaage, mini pizza, and non-alcoholic drinks flooding the table.



Kaori was looking worried wondering whether something happened and took out her smartphone. She was thinking of trying to contact them. But, there was no need for Kaori to contact them.



「Whoops, my bad! We are late!」



「Sorry! Ryu-kun got high tensioned like an idiot, it took time until he calmed down!」



Like that, Suzu and Ryutaro rushed in while apologizing. Hajime and others were about to say「Don’t mind it」, but they reflexively swallowed back their words. And then, their gaze focused at one place.



……Their fingers were entangled with each other’s, that was to say, the hands of the two were holding each other’s hand in a lover holding.



The two noticed everyone’s gaze. Suzu raised her voice「ah」and tried to separate their hand in panic. However, due to it being a lover holding with their fingers interlocked, Ryutaro’s large hand was completely wrapping Suzu’s small hand, so if Ryutaro’s hand didn’t let go then their hand wouldn’t separate that easily.



「Come to think of it, Suzu-chi, just now, didn’t you called Sakagami with “Ryu-kun”?」



「……Seriously? No, or maybe I should say, finally. If it’s Sakagami and Taniguchi then…」



Nana sharply didn’t miss what Suzu said, how the way Suzu called Ryutaro changed (After receiving the confession, Suzu called Ryutaro as Ryu-kun because she wanted to show her affection even more compared to before the confession). Hearing what Nana mentioned, Atsushi leaked out his frustration of having been beaten to the punch, but then he showed an expression that was half purely shocked and half understanding.



「Hee, you two, since when did your relationship become like that?」



Hajime’s mouth burst open in amusement while he was asking the two of them. Thereupon, Ryutaro, looking at the situation where it seemed that his relationship with Suzu had been immediately exposed by the classmates, he was growing embarrassed from that, but even so,



「An hour before!」



Saying that, he made a thumb up along with a lively laugh while informing the classmates. Immediately, Suzu’s face became red, while the classmates raised an admiring voice of「Oo~~!!」. Right after that, the congratulating voice of「Congratulations!」from the girls and「Sakagamiii, for a muscle brain like you to get a girlfriend……die!」「Just explode!」「I also want a lover! Someone, go out with me!」the envious voices from the boys were sent to Ryutaro and Suzu.



By the way, the voice that was soliciting for a lover was smoothly ignored. Shinji was secretly crying after that.



The relationship of Suzu and Ryutaro that changed anew was grandly celebrated by the classmates with Shizuku and Kaori as the first in the list. After everyone had arrived, Hajime stood up and took a glass into his hand. The classmates, Yue and others too, they all took a glass into their hand.



「Now then, we have experienced something idiotic like having a trip to another world, but now, we are able to celebrate a year of our return to the land of our birthplace like this. That one year we spent in another world, and this one year after we returned home, those days were absurdly noisy and full of trouble……but, those days weren’t bad. I think so from the bottom of my heart.」



Hajime’s gentle gaze and expression that looked deep, calmly meshed into the feeling of all the classmates, including Yue and others, all of them then simultaneously nodded deeply.



There were also people who couldn’t come home. But, even with that fact included, everyone certainly felt that “it wasn’t bad”.



「In the future from here on, it is unclear what kind of path any of us will walk, but, if it is us who know about the meaning of “fighting”, then there won’t be any problem or anything. Isn’t that right?」



Everyone returned back a strong nod. To that, Hajime also nodded deeply.



「That’s why, these words are going to be enough for our toast. ……To the two years that we have overcome, and to the hardships from here on! Cheers-!」



「「「「「Chee~~~~rs-!!!」」」」」



Like that the party started.



They talked to each other about their memories in the other world Tortus, they expressed their feelings of this one year since their return home, they jeered loudly at the couples of old and new, they bullied Kousuke, they made an uproar without any meaning, they ate and drank a lot, they lost sight of Kousuke, and they got really noisy.



In the middle, Aiko who finished her work joined them and unfolded a lovey-dovey flirting with Hajime quietly. There Yue nonchalantly cut in with her adult mode, then Shia and the others also crowded Hajime undauntedly and formed their usual pink space. Seeing that, the classmates went into an uproar once again, they felt for real the joy of living right now from their heart, and displayed great excitement in this first year return anniversary.



Before long, when the party was in full swing, without any particular feeling there were voices that began to state their wish of wanting to go to Tortus. Of course, the meaning of that wish wasn’t for living in the other side, those were only frivolous words of wanting to meet with their friends and acquaintances in Tortus.



While they were talking about their memories to each other, the want to meet Liliana and the maids at the palace, the war comrades they fought together with at the decisive battle, and the people they were cooperating with at the time of restoration steadily grew.



Hajime grinned widely to those classmates,



「Then, how about we go meet them for a bit right now?」



That sentence actually also sounded lighthearted.



To open a gate that crossed over the worlds, a vast amount of magic power was needed. When they returned to earth from Tortus, they had to do all kind of processes to capture the magic factor of mother nature into a pseudo-god crystal, then poured the magic power of the cheat group in full into it, and even so it took a month until the gate could be opened.



In the earth where there was almost no magic factor, to open a gate that crossed over the worlds, it should take at least five months at the fastest even with Hajime and others stocking all the magic power in their body.



Five months after they first returned to earth, they opened the gate once, and then after a further five months, they opened the gate again. And so, thinking normally it should take three more months before the gate could be opened.



「Oi, Nagumo. We ain’t going to get surprised by what you are doing after this late, we ain’t gonna start doubting you either. That’s why just spit it out right away. What are you gonna do?」



Ryutaro asked with an expression that was a mix of exasperation and admiration. The classmates were also focusing on Hajime, in the middle of that Hajime suddenly lifted his right hand and activated “Lightning Clad”, causing crimson sparks to crackle through him.



「This lightning clad is a characteristic magic that converts magic power into lightning strikes. Magic power can be converted into electricity……then, don’t you think that the reverse is also possible?」



「Please wait a second, Hajime-kun. I have a really bad premonition of this.」



Aiko’s cheeks convulsed from Hajime’s words. And then, with a small voice, she said something like「A month ago, there was a city that blacked out completely. The electricity was immediately restored but……if I remember correctly, it seemed that there was a nuclear power plant nearby that city」, hearing that the classmates also realized what Hajime had done and their cheeks convulsed greatly.



「Exactly as you imagined. I converted the electricity of a nuclear power plant into magic power, just for a bit. It took a bit of labor to create the exclusive artifact for establishing this conversion method, but finally, I succeeded in realizing it.」



「”Success”, that’s not it! Aa, what have you done when I took off my eyes of you for just a bit……」



Looking at the triumphant look of Hajime who sto――received the electricity of a nuclear power plant, Aiko held her head as though enduring a headache, while the other people were getting a faraway look.



By the way, the city getting blacked out was also something unexpected for Hajime, so he had fixed it so that right now he was able to do magic power conversion without affecting the power supply of the city.



Giving a glance to them who were being absentminded, Hajime took out “Crystal Key” and “Compass” from “Treasure Warehouse II”, he then stabbed the key without any hesitation whatsoever into an empty air and easily opened a gate to another world.



「What, you guys aren’t going?」



Even though he was guilty of something preposterous, as expected, Hajime was acting like there was nothing wrong. The classmates thinking “ah, screw it” slipped through the gate while shouting.



The destination was a reception hall that was located at a corner of the new palace of Hairihi Kingdom.



Liliana and some other people were carrying artifacts that would inform them of Hajime and the others opening a gate, so surely their arrival had been noticed.



As expected, the footsteps of several people immediately became audible.



And then, at the other side of the door that was opened loudly, there was the figure of Liliana breathing hard. The moment Liliana caught sight of Hajime, *daa――――* she dashed.



Like that, everyone was thinking that she would embrace Hajime with a deeply moving expression just like usual but……



There, an unexpected sentence flew out from Liliana’s mouth.



「Big trouble-! It’s a really big trouble! ――Kouki-san, he seems to have been summoned to another world somewhere!」



「Ha?」



The classmates also went「Ha?」as though empathizing with Hajime’s idiotic sounding voice. That was only natural. Even with Liliana speaking about summoning, this was the world that summoned Kouki. It couldn’t be helped even if they tilted their head wondering what Liliana was speaking about.



To them who were like that,



「It’s true! Suddenly there was a voice that came from the sky saying『I found you, hero-sama. I beg you, please save my beloved world』, then a magic circle that I had never seen before spread below Kouki-san――then he vanished! It happened about a week ago!」



Hearing that, the situation finally penetrated the classmates’ head.



In other words, it seemed that in this world where Kouki was summoned as the hero, Kouki was further summoned as the hero into another world somewhere……



「WHAT THE HEEEEEEEEELLLLLLLLL-」



Ryutaro who looked forward to meeting Kouki was the very first person that yelled up the tsukkomi that represented the voices of the heart of everyone here.



It appeared, that the world was still not intending to leave alone Hajime and the others.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Currently, the story of Kouki’s second summoning hasn’t been planned currently.



If I have to say, I’m thinking that ‘I want to write the story of Abyssgate-kun running around busily with teary eyes at the underworld sooon’.



From next time the chronological order will be all over the place too, I’m thinking of posting the after story and an extra story that I want to write little-by-little.



First of all, something like the story of Myuu that had grown to about ten years old.





Chapter 186




Arifureta After – As the Daughter of Demon King Part 1



In the middle of the night, in a room inside the Nagumo household, *tap tap* the small sound of a keyboard being tapped and the light of the display that faintly illuminated the room were spreading.



With a notebook PC being placed beside the pillow, and a posture of lying down with both elbows supporting the upper body, the one who was moving her small legs backward and forward in the air while staying up late was, the princess of the Nagumo family――Myuu. It has already been five years since she arrived in this world. Currently, the ten-year-old Myuu was still small statured as usual, but it appeared that the factor of “beautiful” had slightly entered into her “cuteness”.



At the end of the sentences that she spoke there was still “~nano” attached, the person herself was aware of it and wanted to fix that habit, but even with that she had become a person of firm character that was like a big sister as could be seen from how she had been given an individual room like this.



Although her mother and big sisters seemed to still worry about her because of her similarity with her father that often stayed up late and forgot the time completely due to the subculture. (TN: The subculture here might be talking about the otaku culture, maybe.)



『Nn~. So, Na-chan will also participate in that ceremony nano?』



『That’s right. I will sing a hymn as a member of the choir.』



When Myuu wrote a question by operating the keyboard *tap tap*, the chat partner Na-chan (real name, Natalia) replied back like that. This girl seemed to be a girl of the same age as Myuu, a ten-year-old that claimed she was living in America. The two of them got to know each other by chance through the heartwarming net game they played, and sometimes they even contacted each other like this outside the game. This girl was a friend of Myuu’s.



By the way, Myuu’s language capability was helped by Hajime’s handmade artifact that was inserted with “Language Comprehension” (exclusive for Myuu, provided with voice recognition and letter projection), with this Myuu could not only comprehend languages all over the world, but she could even comprehend ancient languages. Even now she was actually chatting using English.



『Choir huuuh~. That’s amazing nano.』



『Is that so? I think in my country there are a lot of children that enter the choir though.』



『Then, Na-chan’s country will be fine even if the apostles attack anytime then nano. If the country people mobilize altogether and hit hard with the sacred song, you will be able to shave off the apostle’s status by ninety percent. They will become just a mere wooden doll nano.』



『I’m sorry, Myuu. I don’t understand what Myuu saying here……』



Of course, it was natural that she didn’t understand.



Now then, according to their talk today, it appeared that on Sunday Natalia would accompany her parents (who seemed to be fairly high officials) to a large ceremony where government officials would be gathering. There, it seemed that a chorus of hymn would be done by a choir that was comprised of the ceremony participants’ children, so Natalia would also participate in the choir.



However, from Natalia’s viewpoint, there would be nothing that she could really do there other than sing the hymn. At the buffet party after the end of the ceremony, the children had to wait while their parents were having “adult talk (long time)”. Natalia didn’t have any friends there that she was particularly close to, and there was also her parents’ instruction to get along with the children of such-and-such families. It seemed it made her feel constrained and gloomy.



『A~a~, if only Myuu will also attend this party.』



『You can use this chance to become friends with the other children, right?』



『I don’t wanna. Even if I get along with them, if the person is actually a child of a family that is in opposition against father, it will be awkward……there is also some children among the older ones that will come to talk to me because of the instruction of their family, you know? I don’t want to become friends with those kinds of children.』



『Muu, you sound like a noble.』



『Ahaha, what are you saying? Myuu saying that makes it sound like you know some noble. By any chance, is Myuu from Britain?』



『No, Myuu is a sea dweller race.』



『Ahahaha, I always heard you say that, but, what kind of people are this sea dweller race~~』



『We are the women of the sea.』



『Ahahaha~』



Perhaps feeling that the way Myuu talked was amusing, words that expressed laughter were listed on the display screen. Natalia who seemed to calm down after a while wrote a sentence that seemed to be pleading with her unique friend who obviously had a different atmosphere and rhythm compared to her normal school friends.



『Hey, Myuu. I wonder, can you talk with me like this during the party?』



It seemed that the ceremony would be in the afternoon, so even thinking about the time zone difference Myuu would be able to become her talking partner. However, if seeing the figure of a young girl who didn’t properly participate in the party while earnestly playing with her smartphone in the corner, in the end just what would the family and also the surrounding think about Natalia……



However, even if only slightly, Natalia’s atmosphere that was really quite gloomy was conveyed through her sentence.



Seeing that, inside Myuu, the big sister soul was welling up!



『Muu, can’t be helped then.』



『Eh, is it fine? You said that recently you were scolded because you played on the internet too much though……it would be, really late, you know?』



『It’s fine. There is no problem. If it’s for the sake of a friend, then surely I will be allowed. That’s why, Na-chan, I won’t let you get bored and enjoy the party instead nano!』



『Ye, yes. What’s this, I’m happy but, for some reason, I have a bad premonition.』



That premonition of Natalia would splendidly come true during the weekend.



At a certain place in America, on that day, a certain ceremony was being held. At the ceremony that Natalia mentioned, where a lot of government officials were attending, mass media people were also going in and the situation of the ceremony was even broadcasted on the evening news in Japan.



Naturally, the hymn that was sung by the participating children, including Natalia, was also performed as one of the ceremony’s decoration, the figure of the children singing with their all was also broadcasted in the news.



After the ceremony program ended it was time for the standing buffet party. The ceremony was using a floor of a certain high-class hotel that was reserved, so the served cooking was also first class.



The adults were immediately involved in slightly difficult talks of this and that, and then Natalia, who was left alone just as expected, was now trying to become a wallflower and the heaven-sent child of the smartphone.



「Eh, I wonder if Myuu is still not online? By any chance, is it just as I thought, that she was stopped by her mother or her big sisters or someone?」



Natalia confirmed that Myuu wasn’t logging in on the chat room that the two of them usually used. Looking disappointed, Natalia sighed due to the gloomy time she had to spend until the end of the party.



But, it was at that time,



「Young lady. If you sigh like that, then happiness will run away, you know?」



「Eh?」



Natalia was startled and turned her gaze toward the direction of the voice that suddenly came to her. There, the one who spoke a line like a certain skirt chaser was unexpectedly a cute girl about the same age as her.



No, it was a beautiful girl to the degree that the word of cute felt a little lacking for her.



Emerald blond hair that looked fluffy and smooth, and clear jade eyes that looked mystical. Faint pink lips and dreamy rose colored cheeks. That figure which was wearing a dress with a gentle green tone was like a fairy that came out of a fairytale. That faint mischievous smile which had a close resemblance with a Cheshire cat somewhere despite her gentle look also spurred on that imagination.



After a while being in a daze, or possibly being enraptured, Natalia who was staring at that emerald fairy girl saw how that girl was peering into her wonderingly「Nn~?」which caused her to return to her senses with a ‘hah’.



「E, err, you are, who?」



「Muu, that’s mean. Even though I came here because Na-chan said that you are lonely.」



「E, e? Na-chan? E?」



Although this was a wide world, the only one who called her with that pet name was only that amusing friend which was living in Japan.



However, yes, however, Natalia who was relatively clever for her age and parentage immediately rejected that possibility.



Well, of course she was. What was the chance of a friend in Japan to rush here to America just because she was saying that she was lonely? Furthermore, the two of them had the talk about this at three days ago before the ceremony. Myuu wouldn’t be able to make it in time if she didn’t depart immediately, thinking normally this was something impossible.



Even if, just for argument’s sake, Myuu was really coming here for her sake, just how did she enter this place? This was a place where several big shot officials were gathering. Naturally, anyone other than related people would be checked strictly before entering here. There was no way for people other than the invitee that had been registered beforehand could enter.



In that case, there could only be one possibility, that Myuu was actually a child of a family that was invited into the ceremony today just like her family, which meant she had been lying to her all this time. But fundamentally, the two of them had only been talking with internet chatting, or using their net game avatar, they didn’t know each other’s face. Then, as expected this girl in front of her eye was…



「That’s not it nano. Myuu is Myuu herself, the genuine one that is living in Japan you know?」



「-, y, you, as I thought you are Myuu? But how are……」



Myuu who seemed to guess Natalia’s thought talked looking like someone who succeeded in her prank. Myuu then approached Natalia who twitched in surprise and took her hand without hesitation. And then, Myuu brought her lips close to Natalia’s ear, and she whispered softly, as though she was blowing her breath on the ear, just as if she was exposing a secret.



「Myuu is the daughter of the demon king-sama, and also the top disciple of his wives so……」



「……」



「If it’s for a friend, then something like this is no problem nano.」



Myuu stared from really close at Natalia whose face was glowing red for some reason, and then, while smiling and looking slightly troubled,



「Or else, is it a bother for Myuu to come here?」



Myuu asked that.



Natalia’s head was swung left and right at high speed, to the degree that it felt like an afterimage could be seen from that movement. Her expression expressed her feelings more eloquently than anything.



Natalia, who was made to toss away the worthless minor details and felt like Myuu was somewhat forcefully having her way with her, became able to spend her time in this boring and gloomy party with her friend.



By the way, Myuu was here in this place because of Hajime who she asked to send her using the compass and crystal key.



Right now in Japan, the time was already night, so beforehand Myuu had explained about the circumstance and her destination to Hajime and the others. Papa Hajime couldn’t say anything toward his daughter’s global acquaintance and the lightness of her movement, but Yue and the others were feeling warm and fluffy seeing a Myuu that had grown to become completely tough and they sent her here gladly. The one who prepared Myuu’s dress was also Yue and the others.



Although, if they knew that Myuu was making her friend red-faced by her actions and speech that was similar to a handsome man from an otome game performing a wall sandwich to the female character then……there was no doubt that the Nagumo family emergency meeting would be held right away. (TN: Otome game, a game like your usual visual novel, but here the MC is a girl while the targets to be conquered were handsome men instead of beautiful girls. While wall sandwich is slamming one’s hand into the wall in front of somebody (e.g. to stop them from leaving; often viewed as romantic))



「Geez, I was really surprised there!」



「I won’t let you get bored――that was what Myuu said, Myuu is keeping Myuu’s own words.」



「Aah, this rhythm, you are unmistakably Myuu.」



Natalia dropped her shoulders while intensely accepting the situation after seeing Myuu, who was saying such a thing, with a stiff and crisp expression. She accepted that the beautiful girl in front of her eyes that could be mistaken for a fairy was exactly her friend Myuu.



「I won’t ask about the details, but you really came here huh.」



「Nn. If Natalia is lonely, Myuu will rush to your side even if you are in another world.」



「-, thank you Myuu. ……For some reason, I got the hunch that in the future Myuu will be someone that is really no good you know.」



「Strange……recently Myuu is often told of something like that. Even though Myuu is just imitating all the onee-chans and papa.」



「Those onee-chans and papa-san, aren’t they also getting called as no good people?」



「Hah!?」



Even while having idiotic talk like that, Natalia’s heart was beating livelily inside. Her heart was beating fast because if the existence of Myuu, that shouldn’t be listed on the invitation list, got found out, it would become a really great uproar. But even more than that nervousness, she was feeling really happy that she could unexpectedly meet her friend, which she had wanted to meet, like this.



Furthermore, her friend was cuter than what she imagined. Myuu was humorous and for some reason, Myuu also looked adult-like. Myuu was exactly a friend that made her want to boast about her to other people.



Their talk was naturally turning lively, both of them were turning into wallflowers, yet they were looking more animated and purely having more fun than anyone there.



But that enjoyable time was suddenly broken.



Along with a sound *gashan*, one middle-aged male knocked over his glass while collapsing down. The surrounding people rushed to that person in a panic to check the situation, and they found out that the person appeared to be sleeping. The people got exasperated and explained to the surrounding that this person surely drank too much alcohol, but in the middle of that, suddenly another person at a different spot also collapsed similarly like that.



With that as the beginning, the people at the party venue were crumbling down one after another and fainted at different intervals.



「Wha, what? What is going……a, u?」



「Natalia?」



Natalia was bewildered, but in the middle of speaking her words suddenly cut off. When Myuu turned her gaze to her, she found the figure of Natalia falling to her knee with her eyelids looking like they would close anytime. She was obviously being assaulted by unnatural sudden sleepiness.



Myuu immediately caught Natalia who looked like she was going to fall, and then she became aware that she was also getting sleepy.



「This is……by any chance the cooking is? Uu, even though this should be a normal party……is this also because Myuu is papa’s daughter nano?」



While murmuring something that might damage Hajime relatively if he heard it, Myuu said「It’s fine」to Natalia who looked like she would faint anytime. She then took out a magic medicine from her “Treasure Warehouse” and drank it. With that, the sleepiness was blown off immediately.



Myuu thought of giving Natalia the medicine too, but because she felt a doubt whether Natalia would be able to get a hold of herself in the event of what would occur from here on. In the end, Myuu didn’t do that.



She then decided to send a mail to Hajime but noticed that the transmission was being jammed. At that point in time, she caught the sound of the footsteps of a group approaching.



Myuu groaned「Muu」while looking around. Most of the people seemed to have consumed the cooking that was laced with a sleeping drug, and they were all sound asleep or almost falling asleep. No, when Myuu saw that the security and the waiters were also falling asleep, it seemed that another method other than dosing the cooking was also used.



To do something like making all people in a strictly guarded party of politicians to faint without killing or wounding anyone was impossible with just average planning and organizational capability.



「Can’t be helped nano.」



Myuu looked at Natalia with a troubled expression, and then she laid down in that spot snuggling close to Natalia. Then she pretended to sleep while opening her eyes only slightly so that no one would notice.



「Wake up, Na-chan. Come on, wake up.」



「Mmm-」



The squishy sensation that was gently touching her cheek, the sensation of her head getting patted slowly caused Natalia’s consciousness to become half awake. On the other side of her faintly opened eyelids, there was the upside down figure of Myuu peering into her face.



「Myuu?」



「Yes, it’s Myuu. Good morning, Na-chan.」



「Un, good morning. But, why is Myuu in my room?」



「Na-chan. If you are seriously mistaking this room that is surrounded by concrete and an iron door as your own room, then Myuu has to have a talk with Na-chan’s family at once, you know?」



「E? …………………-!?」



Natalia, who finally recovered from her sleepiness, rose her body suddenly and ran her gaze over the surroundings. She confirmed that the place she was in was exactly just as Myuu said, a room of dreary concrete and an iron door.



At the same time, she caught sight of children other than her and Myuu. Nearly ten children about the same age were huddling in the corner of the room where they were already awake. Looking at how everyone was wearing party outfits, it seemed that they were children that were also in that party venue. Several of the children had faces that she knew as members of the same choir with her.



Every one of them was sitting down looking scared. Natalia’s gaze then turned back at Myuu who seemed to be giving her a lap pillow.



「Myu, Myuu. Just what in the world, how did this……where is here!? What happened to us!? Where is father!?」



Natalia was on the verge of panic. To that, Myuu closed their distance smoothly and embraced Natalia’s head closely. And then, Myuu gently clapped Natalia’s back several times while saying「It’s fine, it’s fine nano. Myuu is together with Na-chan here nano.」, this sentence was whispered to Natalia with an extraordinarily gentle tone.



Having those done to her, Natalia gradually relaxed ‘funya’ with her composure returning back.



Judging that Natalia had calmed down, Myuu separated their body, and then she also turned her gaze at the other children and opened her mouth.



「First, all of us were made to sleep by the drug that was laced on the cooking, and then we got kidnapped nano. After that, we were taken to this place by car after traveling for about forty minutes. The ones who are kidnapped are only the children that were in the venue, the adults were left alone in the venue.」



The word ‘kidnapped’ made the children almost cried, but before that happened Myuu continued her words.



「Not everyone is in this room but at the very least all the children that were taken away from that venue seem to be inside this building. According to the perpetrators’ conversation, it seems that they are making various demands just as expected. All of us are the hostages for that. The perpetrators are a really large organization, all their members are equipped with firearms. It looks like it will be some time before help will come for us nano. Anyway, the current situation is something like that. Are there any questions?」



「First, I want to ask just how can Myuu understand that much!」



Myuu’s well-reasoned explanation made everyone’s face turn into something like「Ah, yes」, but from among them, Natalia howled. In response to that, Myuu answered frankly.



「Because Myuu has been awake all along!」



「The sleeping drug!?」



「Detoxified!」



Natalia didn’t even ask about ‘how?’ or anything anymore. While her words got caught in her throat, Natalia exclaimed,



「Wh, why, are you this calm?」



She threw that natural question at Myuu. To that,



「Because Myuu has an abundance of experience of getting kidnapped nano.」



「Just what kind of life have you had!?」



「Getting made to cross a desert, getting locked in an underground prison, getting washed away in a sewer, getting displayed in an auction, getting kidnapped by a monstrous sister……」



「Stoooop, I don’t want, to hear more than thaaat!」



When Myuu explained this and that of the kidnapping cases she experienced while counting with her fingers, for some reason Natalia then hugged her while crying. Surely Natalia was getting the impression that Myuu was an unfortunate girl that had went through a gruesome life.



「Uu, but, then, why is Myuu here? If it’s Myuu, then shouldn’t you be able to escape?」



「Myu?」



While wiping her eyes roughly with her sleeve, Natalia asked a question that if it was Myuu she should be able to escape. Despite being the center of attention for the other children, due to the conversation of these two, Myuu was tilting her head as though to say「Just what are you talking about I wonder?」while answering.



「Even though Na-chan is getting taken away, just why would Myuu run away nano?」



「u」



Hearing Myuu’s answer that sounded like she was saying, ‘even though 1+1=2, why would you answer with 3?’, Natalia couldn’t say anything anymore. Myuu was just too much of a handsome guy, the young maiden Natalia-chan couldn’t say anything! Her face was that of a ripe apple!



In order to avert her mind, Natalia asked what they were going to do from here on.



「For the time being, Myuu will contact papa nano.」



Saying that Myuu took out her smartphone from under her dress’s skirt. The boy hostages were whispering, 「Eh, weren’t all the smartphones confiscated……」but……under the skirt of a girl was a grand mystery. Surely that was how it was.



The boys’ face delicately blushed at the thighs of Myuu that they caught sight of from the flipped skirt, and they averted their gaze (it seemed that their tension and terror were softened from watching the exchange between Myuu and Natalia) while Myuu was trying to contact Hajime……



「!? Now I’ve done it, nano……」



Suddenly Myuu hung her head down while on all fours. On Myuu’s hand, was a smartphone that displayed a lightless pitch black screen.



Actually, this smartphone was different from the normal smartphone that Myuu took out previously, it was a communication artifact that Hajime created. So that Myuu could use it, it was a type with a magic power storage loaded inside just like Myuu’s other exclusive artifacts; but if it was asked what was its difference with a normal smartphone, then it was at how it was able to communicate with another world.



If one possessed this smartphone, at the very least it would be impossible for the owner to be unable to contact Hajime and others who possessed the same device no matter where they were on earth, so even if the normal smartphone was taken away then there would be no problem, was what Myuu was thinking but……



「I forgot, to recharge it nano……」



It would cost much energy if it was used to contact another world. Before this, Myuu, who was in that age, against her better judgment got too engrossed in talking with her friend, and she used up too much of the stored magic power and got scolded by papa Hajime. This time too she recently unconsciously used the phone too much. Fearing the scolding she avoided asking to recharge the phone, which caused the phone to be completely empty currently.



「E, err, Myuu?」



Natalia who somehow guessed the situation after seeing Myuu who kept feeling down on all fours, sent Myuu a faint smile. Myuu who noticed that raised her face all of a sudden, and opened her mouth while averting her gaze.



「For humans, it’s no good to pay attention only to the past nano. Looking to the future is exactly what is right nano. Isn’t that correct, Nataliaaa!!」



「Ee!? E, err……」



「This is not a failure nano. This is a discovery that this method is not working nano!」



「Ye, yes?」



「And so, let’s give up contacting papa.」



「……」



Myuu cheerfully stored the smartphone inside the skirt (was how it looked like, but it was actually stored inside her “Treasure Warehouse”). While Natalia and the others were staring at Myuu with an expression that couldn’t say anything, Myuu crossed her arms and begin to think while nodding ‘yup yup’ to herself.



(Eerr, promise number 1 to papa, don’t expose your true identity, and don’t show the artifact. Promise number 2 to papa, at the time it’s necessary, always discuss it first with someone, whether it’s papa or one of the onee-chan. Promise number 3, when there is no time to protect promise number 1 and 2, at the time that Myuu thinks that it’s necessary……)



「――”Do as you like. As for the clearing up afterwards, I’ll do it”, papa said nano. Yup, right now is that time nano.」



Myuu, who had reconfirmed her important promises with papa, was whispering「Papa is just too cool nano. When Myuu recalled it Myuu got to fall in love all over again nano」inside her head while deciding on her plan from here on precisely.



Anyway, she had told Hajime the time the party would end, so even without her contacting him, no, exactly because she wasn’t contacting him, Hajime should get suspicious and he would open a gate to the party venue to pick up Myuu. Combining the time that they were being kidnapped and the time she spent at the party, Hajime should notice the abnormality in less than an hour.



When that happened, Hajime possessed the “Compass of Guidance”, so he would be able to instantly search for Myuu’s whereabouts. With that, this kidnapping incident would be resolved.



In the case that, for example, the situation changed before Hajime noticed, Myuu would use all the power she was gifted with and settle the problem without holding back. She planned to fight for the sake of her life and her friend’s life while entrusting the information concealment after that to her papa who was the most reliable person in the world.



In the case that she was fighting she would recover her smartphone, that should be somewhere in this building, and contact Hajime. With that, all the problems would be resolved.



With that being the plan that she decided on, Myuu fired herself up with「Yosh-, nano!」while her speaking habit that she was usually being careful so that it wouldn’t come out was going out in full throttle. Natalia and the other children, who were staring fixedly at such a Myuu, saw Myuu turn around to them, and they spontaneously gulped at Myuu’s wide smile toward them.



「It’s okay to not be that worried. Because everything is fine nano.」



That sentence wasn’t a mere consolation, or a wishful thinking, or even a bluff. A strength that made anyone who listened to be convinced, existed in her words. The tension in the children’s bodies naturally lessened and their expressions slightly recovered their natural color.



Myuu nodded once at those children, and then while whispering「Just in case, Myuu will make preparation nano.」, Myuu gathered the children to the corner of the room, then she began to set up small crosses in their surrounding.



Perhaps there was no meaning to wonder about it anymore but for the time being, the children watched Myuu putting her hand under her skirt once more. Although she had shown for real how she was taking out crosses from there, the size and number of the crosses were obviously surpassing the range that was possible to be stored inside a children’s skirt. That profoundly mysterious phenomenon caused Natalia to have a faraway look while the other children’s eyes were sparkling brightly from watching Myuu’s every single move.



「You……who are you?」



One blond-haired young boy, who blushed from Myuu’s smile, leaked out that question in a small voice.



In response to that, Myuu, who was nodding in satisfaction after finishing setting up the crosses, then proclaimed with brimming confidence and a grandly triumphant look, as though it was exactly her pride.



「Myuu’s name is Myuu. The beloved daughter――of the god-slaying demon king-sama nano!」



It went without saying that the faces of the children went blank hearing that.



A little bit after that.



In just a few minutes Myuu was becoming the center of this imprisonment room. It was obvious that the children would gather under Myuu, who even in this situation was still smiling without even a single agitation. Everyone huddled together wanting to be at Myuu’s side.



Seeing that, for some reason, Natalia wasn’t feeling amused. Myuu had asked for all the children to introduce themselves, and after everyone finished their introductions Myuu stated that Natalia was “a close friend nano!”. If Myuu didn’t do that, then perhaps right now Natalia would be acting sullen regardless of the current situation.



(Besides, that guy, isn’t he being too close?)



Natalia was occupying one of Myuu’s sides while at the opposite side there was a blond young boy talking passionately to Myuu. The sharpness of Natalia’s gaze toward that boy was growing without end.



It was unclear whether the blond-haired boy noticed it, but the boy was continuing to talk to Myuu while sometimes feeling concerned of Natalia’s gaze.



「Err, I don’t really understand but……anyway, Myuu-chan’s papa is absurdly strong, and he will immediately locate us and then beat up those guys, is that true?」



The blond-haired young boy――he who had the name Emile asked Myuu. The children had sparkling eyes from hearing Myuu’s story about how strong her papa was, but Emile, who was comparatively calm, was thinking realistically during Myuu’s story and had noticed some things that should be impossible without using magic mixed in the story, so his impression became like that.



By the way, the total number of the children inside the room was nine. Every one of them were all children of the government officials that attended that party.



「Yup. If it’s papa, then against that kind of guys it would be instant kill nano. And if it is the onee-chans, then even if it’s just one of them then the bad guys will go splat or go boom, or go zap, or go pew.」



「I, I see. Yep, I see……」



For some reason, Emile felt like he was hearing excessively graphic sound effects, but he did his best in ignoring it.



「But, in that case then it seems that it will be all the better to not do anything uncalled for then. If within thirty more minutes our whereabouts will get find out, then let’s not do anything dangerous. Myuu-chan too, it seemed that you did something like pretending to sleep but it’s no good to do risky things, you know?」



「It will be fine. Nn~, Emile is kind nano.」



「-, no, no such thing, though……」



Myuu smiled sweetly at Emile who was worrying for her even in this kind of situation. The youth Emile noticed that something was shot through inside him. 「Aa~, Emile is getting red!」or「Emile, you actually like Myuu don’t you!」and so on, jeering characteristic of children was breaking out from the others seeing Emile’s face.



Natalia’s gaze was rapidly growing sharper. It was to the level that made one doubt whether this girl was really a ten-year-old!



Emile’s face went bright red while he made his objection inside that atmosphere, but the more he got worked up and denied the jeering, the deeper he was digging the hole for himself. Natalia’s face was growing to resemble Hannya. The tragic feeling that enveloped the children at the beginning couldn’t be found anywhere anymore.



In exchange, the youth Emile had to taste the tragic feeling instead.



「I’m sorry nano. Myuu, cannot answer Emile’s feeling!」



「I got strongly rejected! Wh, why? No, it, it’s not like, I like Myuu-chan or anything though. I’m asking here, because I’m just, feeling curious, or something……」



「Emile is not my type nano!」



「I got struck with a straight ball! The, then, what is your type……no, this is too, just because I’m curious, or something, it’s not like I really want to he, he, hear though……」



「Myuu like papa!」



「That’s an overly sharp curve ball! No, see here, Myuu-chan. It’s fine that you like your papa but, you cannot actually marry him……also, that, that’s different from liking a lover or something……」



「aAA?」



「Hii, I got threatened by a cute face that looked like a gangster! No, because, your papa, he is your father, you know?」



「We are not related by blood so there is no problem.」



「Unthinkable development! Lo, look here, Myuu-chan. Even though you two are not related by blood, he is your mother’s beloved person, isn’t he? Then, if Myuu-chan is feeling like that to your father, won’t your mother feeling troubled?」



「Mama said, ‘if there is an opening then take it!’ to Myuu nano!」



「Unthinkable backup! Such a thing……just what kind of family is Myuu-chan’s family……」



「There are mama and papa, then Ojii-chan and Obaa-chan, then in addition to papa’s wife there are also seven more wives, it’s a normal family.」



「There is something wrong with Myuu-chan’s father, you know!?」



「aAA!?」



「Hii, I’m sorry! I beg you here, don’t make a face like a mafia boss with that cute face!」



Emile-kun’s first love was showered with blows.



The surrounding children cackled. Natalia was hugging Myuu’s arm while making an expression of「Serves you right!!」. Natalia’s character was in danger of crumbling.



Amidst that, a blond girl looking slightly older than Myuu was asking with sparkling bright eyes, as expected it seemed that love stories being the favorite food of any girl were a common point that was shared by all worlds.



「Hey hey, Myuu-chan. Then, when will you confess to your papa?」



「Nn~, confess? Nn~」



Myuu tilted her head a little, then after showing a thinking gesture「Nn~」, her eyes slowly narrowed.



「If it’s confession then Myuu does it every day. Every day, Myuu says Myuu love papa nano.」



「Ee~, your papa won’t get it like that you know, absolutely~」



「Nope. Papa is sharp so he understands. But, Myuu is still little, so papa is not thinking of Myuu like that nano……that’s why……」



「That’s why?」



The girls’ eyes were sparkling with their heart beating fast, Emile was being crushed under a tragic feeling, Natalia was staring at Myuu with a complicated expression, and the boys were directing their grin at such an Emile. Amidst all those, Myuu……



「That’s why……eventually, Myuu will eat up Papa nano.」



Saying that Myuu licked her lips. She chuckled「Fufu」with faintly blushing cheeks and eyes that were moist from passion. It was a bewitching figure that closely resembled a certain vampire princess, to the degree that it made one want to retort「Eh, she is ten-years-old right?」.



Spontaneously, the girls were shaken「Hawawa-」, the boys were overcome with a surprise to the point that their souls almost flew away while Emile and Natalia pressed their hands on their heart as though they were shot through.



As expected, it seemed that Myuu had inherited properly even the things that didn’t need to be inherited from her uncommon older sisters.



But, it was at that time, that the symbol of terror that was blown away thanks to Myuu became a footstep that resounded from the other side of the door. The children suddenly realized and they huddled close to the wall.



「Myu, Myuu……」



「Nn, it’s fine. I won’t let them touch even a single hair of Na-chan.」



「Un, I, believe in Myuu.」



The door opened with a creaking sound, and from the other side two men with their faces hidden by masks and something that seemed to be assault rifles hanging on their shoulders entered the room.



「Oi, which one we are going to take?」



「They are all the same, right? Anyway, other than that brat, these brats are all the kids of government or army officials. The effect will be the same no matter which one we kill. We also kidnapped a lot at other bases too anyway. It will be fine even if we used up all the brats here.」



「I see. It’s us two first for the time being huh. One will be killed right away as an example, right?」



The two who were exchanging in conversation, which could only be associated with a dark future no matter how you looked at it, were acting as though the lives of children were worth nothing. It caused the children’s bodies to shrink and shiver. And then, one of the men reached out his hand to a girl that he just happened to catch sight of――at Natalia who Myuu covered behind her. But, that hand was stopped by the surprisingly strong grip of a small hand.



「……in the end, the time limit came first nano.」



「You are in the way, brat.」



A cold gaze that robbed all warmth pierced Myuu from behind the mask. Myuu talked to that man without even hiding her atmosphere of ‘it’s impossible huh’.



「This is a warning. It’s better for you all to immediately release all of us without doing anything at all to us. Ojii-san, you all have no chance of winning nano.」(TN: Ojii-san=uncle)



「………………fuh」



That unthinkable speech which came from a ten-year-old girl in this situation made the masked man to be lost for words spontaneously, but the moment his mind caught up, a snort came out from his nose. Thinking that the little existence before his eyes really didn’t know anything of what was called reality, caused ridicule to well up inside him.



At the same time, a color of sadism came into being inside his eyes. When he looked closer, it was a little girl with a very pretty look. This pretty little girl who didn’t know anything about reality, if he made her taste overwhelming violence, just what kind of voice would she be chirping with then, the man wondered.



Myuu who knew about the unreasonableness of reality understood what was in the mind of this kind of man like the back of her own hand. Therefore, while she was sighing in her heart that as expected, words wouldn’t do anything anymore now, at the moment when the masked man was about to strike Myuu, her lips curved up fearlessly.



「Enemy is to be killed nano!」



「-, wha!?」



Before he knew it, a small pistol for Myuu’s use was gripped in her hand and was pushed against the man’s stomach forcefully.



Just why a kidnapped child was holding a gun――even while feeling chaotic confusion from the incomprehensible situation, the man immediately twisted his body but,



*pan-*



A dry sound rang out, at the same time, the man received a fierce impact on his stomach, without even being able to scream the man turned in a somersault.



「Shit-, this brat-」



「……」



The other man aimed his assault rifle at Myuu――but, faster than the man, Myuu summoned a similar pistol in her other hand without even changing her posture or turning her sight. A bullet flew below Myuu’s armpit and impacted the stomach of the man who was at the left behind Myuu.



Once more, a dry sound *pan-* resounded along with the man groaning with a small voice while crumbling down. And then, even with an unbelieving expression, the man was trying to pull the trigger of his assault rifle.



「Fly away you asshole nano!」



Before anyone realized, Myuu stepped in and in her hands was a comical hammer that was gripped――at the head of the hammer there was a rabbit character that looked like Mif○y attached colored in red and yellow――the pico pico hammer’s full swing pummeled the head of the man mercilessly and sent him flying. (TN: Search in google using this word ピコピコハンマー to find the illustration of pico pico hammer)



The man crashed on the wall *bekyo!* before crumbling down powerlessly. Giving that man only a glance, Myuu shouldered the pico pico hammer while turning around, and then toward the first man who was trying to stand up somehow.



「Hey-, wai――」



「No waiting nano!」



The pico pico hammer struck violently in full power. The hammer that flew with a force that was unthinkable when coming from the strike of a ten-year-old girl hit directly at the man’s face. *pikon-!* Such comical sounds and star images were scattered while the man was sinking down.



「Myuu……」



「A, amazing……」



Natalia’s eyes opened wide while Emile was letting out a murmur of admiration. That expression and murmur represented the heart of everyone there. After all, two adult men armed with guns were instantly killed by a girl whose age was not that different from them. In addition, there was also the weapons that appeared one after another like a magic trick.



However, Myuu’s expression didn’t show any sense of accomplishment. Rather, with a grim expression from her wariness that was raising up further, she was staring at the other side of the door and gave an instruction to the dumbfounded children.



「Na-chan, everyone. Until I say that it’s fine, you all absolutely must not get out from behind those crosses. Understand?」



「Eh, Myuu, we are not going to escape even though those men have been defeated?」



「Yup, several people are heading here after hearing the commotion just now nano. Even if we want to escape, right now it’s dangerous to go outside.」



「Go, got it.」



Natalia led the other children and they huddled against each other behind the crosses that Myuu had lined up. During that time, Myuu took out a new weapon. This time she chose something that would make as little sound as possible.



Right after that, three men stepped into the room. They were taken aback after seeing that two of their comrades were defeated before they aimed their rifle muzzle at the children. They were going to question the children what happened when,



*hyun hyun-*



The sound of something cutting through wind entered their ears. At the same time, one of the men received a fierce impact on his head that blew his consciousness to the beyond.



「Wha-」



「This brat-」



Voices of shock and curses resounded. Right after that, Myuu, whose dress waved from her elegant twirling motion, directed the weapon in her hand to the enemies and launched it with that twirling motion and her wrist snap.



*hyun* the sound of something cutting apart the air resounded and pulverized the ankle of one of the men while wrapping around it at the same time.



――Myuu’s exclusive use Black Whip “This is Weapon Desu”



The emphasis in the naming was surely the consideration of the papa so that the perverted character of the whip art teacher wouldn’t be transferred to his beloved daughter even in the worst case. It was a caution toward the daughter so that the whip would never, ever be used for any other purpose other than as a weapon.



“This is Weapon Desu” crashed the man whose ankle was pulverized into the man at his side before letting go, and then it struck the wrist of the man whose balance was broken. Just with that the bone of the wrist was smashed and the man screamed while dropping his gun. The collapsed man tried to ready his rifle while the man whose wrist was broken tried to take out his pistol from his waist, but the tip of the whip bent and hit the head of the two men hard almost at the same time and robbed them of their consciousness.



「Mu-, there is still one more nano!」



「-, what the, you-」



The last man who was standing by outside the room showed his figure while pulling his rifle’s trigger toward the girl who instantly made the three men entering the room faint. *da da da da da-* Amidst the fiercely reverberating sound of a gun shooting Myuu threw away her black whip and took out the “Pikko Piko Hammeeer” once again and threw it forward.



Myuu, who was in the line of fire, was hiding in the shadow of the “Pikko Piko Hammeeer” so that the bullets didn’t hit her. The stray bullets that missed Myuu passed through to the back――toward the group of children behind.



「Kyaaah, wait, eee!?」



「Li, liees……」



Before the eyes of Natalia, Emile, and the others who spontaneously screamed, the bullets were stopping with ripples spreading throughout midair.



――Myuu’s exclusive use Barrier Artifact “Don’t Touch, You Pervert!”



The lined up crosses were artifacts where a barrier would be deployed with those crosses as the base. So that bullets wouldn’t hit the children even in the worst case, Myuu made a simple safe zone inside the room beforehand. The naming made apparent just what kind of situation that the creator imagined this artifact would be used for.



And then, Myuu herself who had completely protected the children from the wicked bullets was……



「Sleep nano.」



「aAA!?」



The thrown “Pikko Piko Hammeeer” instantly blocked the sight of the enemy and within an instant Myuu circled to the back of the opponent with low steps as though she was crawling on the ground, and with two kodachi in her hands, she rotated while severing the tendons of the enemy’s two legs. At the same time, the head of the man who became unable to keep standing and crumbled down was hit and hit by two consecutive pommel strikes, causing the man to faint with the white of his eyes exposed.



――Myuu’s exclusive use Twin Katana “Muuramasa-Kotetsuu”



This artifact would react to Myuu’s image and could activate high-speed vibration-slash wave-impact generation, on top of that, just by holding it would cause Myuu’s perception and physical ability to rise. These two kodachi were truly worthy to be called as “demon sword”.



By the way, the twin sword art that Myuu learned was based from Kaori’s twin large sword art combined with Shizuku’s Yaegashi-style. Especially the combo of the rotating slash continued with a pommel strike just now was a technique that was just one step short of being the secret technique of the Yaegashi-style.



「For now we managed to endure through emergency, but reinforcements will surely come soon, so everyone, prepare to escape.」



Myuu twirled the two kodachi before like a magic trick, and the two swords disappeared somewhere. Looking at Myuu, the children finally raised their joyful voices and rushed out from behind the crosses. Their mouths sent Myuu words of praise like「Myuu-chan is amazing!」「So cool!」「Stro―ng!」.



「Myuu! Are you okay? You are not injured?」



「Myuu-chan! You are okay!?」



「Na-chan, Emile. Myuu is fine nano. Rather than that, the next enemy will come soon, so we are going to move to a place where it’s easier to fight while we have time. It will be dangerous if they throw a grenade in a dead end closed room like this.」



Even though Myuu had cut a swath through grown-up men like butter, she didn’t look particularly proud and instead calmly gave the children the next instruction. Witnessing this, Natalia and Emile raised an enraptured voice「Fuai」sounding extremely stupid.



Myuu gave a glance at the two of them who were like that, and then she took an action that made Natalia want to scream while making the boys feel both really happy and embarrassed. After all, Myuu’s dress suddenly vanished.



「Fuwah」



「Wai-, hey-, you guys, don’t look-」



The dress was only stored inside the “Treasure Warehouse”, but from the point of view of the children who didn’t know about such a thing, it looked like Myuu was suddenly only wearing underwear. Furthermore, the undressed Myuu was wearing a green baby doll that wafted off an adult air which made one want to say ‘isn’t that a bit inappropriate for a ten-year-old?’



Myuu’s white skin that looked transparent was exposed generously, but there was no color of shame at Myuu’s serious expression. For Myuu who once went through an adventure in a world of sword and magic, something of this degree wasn’t worth feeling bothered about at all, to say nothing of how it was in the middle of a battle right now.



And then, in this battlefield, there was one reason why Myuu took off her dress.



Right after that, Myuu’s body was enveloped with a faint light, and then in the next moment, Myuu transformed into a new outfit.



A dress shirt that really resembled what Yue was wearing, and white-hot pants that resembled the one that Shia was wearing. White knee high socks that exposed the absolute territory of her legs, and cute frilly short boots. Her waist was wrapped with two gun belts like what Shizuku wore crossing each other.



A miniaturized “Picco Pico Hammeeer” was attached to the back of the gun belt on that waist while colorful gems were fitted on the countless slots that were usually for storing bullets. On Myuu’s two thighs at opposing sides were two gun holsters fitted with “Donneerr-Schlaaag” while on her back were “Muuramasa-Kotetsuu” attached crossing each other.



This was exactly the complete battle readiness of Myuu! She transformed instantly. That figure with an outfit change and weapon change was just like a magical girl somewhere!



In fact, all of the children that were directing yearning looks at Myuu said「Myuu-chan is a magical girl……」.



But, at that time, sounds of angry voices and many footsteps running to here entered Myuu’s ears. It appeared that she couldn’t expect the enemy to only send a small number of their forces anymore, and she also couldn’t hope to just wait-and-see. The enemy had clearly understood that they weren’t attacking but were receiving a counterattack, so they were sending their “battle force” to here.



Most likely, it would be thirty or forty more minutes before the time limit where Hajime would notice the strangeness. If Myuu was asked whether she could buy time until then by holing up, then as expected, no matter how many times she was reassessing the situation the answer that she came up with was doubtful.



Above all else, teachings like a nonaggressive defense of constantly being in defensive while kept being getting done in――was something that Myuu didn’t get taught with!



「You all are enemy nano. Enemy is to be pow-wowed nano!」



With her two beloved guns that were gifted to her by her beloved papa in two hands, *click* Myuu made a wide fearless grin.



Right now, the daughter of the demon king was starting to move.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



It feels like, I’m just doing whatever I like……



But, I’m not reflecting or regretting. Aa, I’m having fun writing.



About the trivial detail, I will be happy if everyone turns a blind eye with your usual tolerance of [Well, this is Shirakome after all].





Chapter 187




To all the riajuu, and to the villagers of loneliness village too, to everyone.



People dressed in colorful costumes, mysterious creatures(mascots), shrieks that contained joy and excitement, sound effects and music that were resounding here and there.



That place, which looked unreal and extraordinary, was a certain famous theme park.



The season was winter. Furthermore, today was the day when the end of the year would soon arrive――it was Christmas.



It was natural that there were more lovers than usual, but there were also people who came with their family or fellow friends. They all came in droves to enjoy, to their heart’s content, this theme park that had been remodeled for only a limited time, dyed in the color of Christmas.



The theme park, which had amassed such a number of visitors that it made the face of the management to burst out in a chuckle, was visited by a group that was a little special. It was a group that consisted of one man and eight beautiful girls and women. On the shoulder of that man was a little girl with sparkling bright eyes. It went without saying that this group was Hajime and the wives (Yue, Shia, Tio, Kaori, Shizuku, Remia, Aiko, and Liliana). Shuu and Sumire had work. It also went without saying that the two of them were shedding tears because they couldn’t come.



By the way, in the current time, Liliana was still unable to separate herself from the kingdom, so normally she was staying in the kingdom. However, in this long-awaited holy night, it would be too cruel to leave Liliana alone, so Hajime opened a gate and kidnapped Liliana who was in the middle of work.



For the moment, by using the system to convert electricity into magic power (Hajime had built a personal geothermal electric power generator deep underground so he could convert magic power as he pleased), the number of times they could freely come and go between Tortus and earth had increased, so there was no particular problem with doing this.



「Papa, papa! There, let’s go there nano! That one with shark-san going haup!」(TN: Seems Myuu is referring to a shark opening its jaw and then swallowing in a flash.)



「Yes yes. Even though it’s cold here, but you intentionally chose water attraction huh. Is this because of Myuu’s race trait?」



Myuu was given a ride on Hajime’s shoulder, her legs were swinging back and forth while she was squealing merrily. Her head was covered with a fluffy Santa hat, and her appearance was that of a mini skirt Santa costume. Her legs were wrapped with white stockings, and her boots were white with a pompon attached, each time her legs moved they would flutter around.



With emerald blonde hair that flowed down from the Santa hat, her well ordered gentle features that were inherited from her mother, her innocent merriness, and her fawning over her papa with all her might made this little girl stand out despite all the onee-chan surrounding the papa. The gazes of the people in the surrounding were unconsciously pulled toward her, and when they caught sight of her they wouldn’t be able to help themselves from loosening up their expression warmly.



Just as Santa Myuu wished for, papa Hajime was heading toward the aquatic attraction where they would have an adventure on a river, where a giant shark was lurking.



While waiting, the other visitors kept stealing glances toward the beautiful appearance of Yue and the others……however, there was no such thing happening. Due to an artifact that obstructed people’s recognizance, the surrounding wasn’t paying any attention to Yue and the others.



In exchange, it was Yue and the others whose gazes were wandering around restlessly. Especially Liliana whose familiarity with this world was still faint. She seemed to be receiving culture shocks from various things, and from behind the eyeglass of the recognizance obstruction, her gaze, that was possibly sparkling even brighter than Myuu’s, was running through the area.



They had entered the theme park in the morning, and by now the sun had gone down considerably, but Liliana’s excitement hadn’t settled down yet.



「……Really, Hajime-san’s world is just like a jack-in-the-box. They are building a facility like this only for the sake of amusement. The scale of this is just like a small city, you know? The sightseeing ward at Furen is also something, but this place is on a different level. No, should I perhaps call this as the difference in passion and seriousness toward amusement? Even though this is a large scale facility, I can see their fixation even on the minor details. It has surpassed the rationality as a mere business, and I can feel the zeal of the people affecting the construction. I wonder about how much they spent in building this. And the profit? The number of visitors per year? The development in the future? The owner of this facility is a common merchant……no, the owner is a corporation, isn’t it? If this can be managed by the country instead……. No, if the substantial aspect is left to Furen while the country becomes the contract partner……」



It seemed that Liliana was getting excited at a point that was slightly off. Even though she had arrived here in this rare chance to the world of dreams, furthermore, it was on the holy night, this princess of another world seemed to be curious about the selling point of the theme park instead. And what was mysterious from this was that the sparkling eyes of a dreaming maiden now strangely looked like the fiercely glaring eyes of someone aiming for money.



After Hajime returned to earth, it could be imagined just how hard Liliana. who was left behind, was working, so if it was asked if this couldn’t be helped then perhaps it really couldn’t be helped……but perhaps she had been neglected a bit too much. Hajime, Yue, and the others were sending lukewarm gazes mixed with pity toward Liliana.



While that happened, the turn for Hajime and the others had arrived. They boarded the boat that had drifted in in front of their eyes. The boat had a roof attached and could be boarded by around twenty people, with a vertical bench set up at the center so that the occupants could sit while facing the outside.



Myuu sat down on Hajime’s lap like it was only natural and was staring at the route looking thrilled.



Before long the boat slowly advanced. At the same time, an onee-san, looking like an adventurer with a rifle in one hand, was talking with a lot of realism about just how dangerous this adventure would be and how brutal the existence that was lurking at the bottom of the water was.



Just as could be expected from a worker at a large-scale theme park, her talking skill was first class. The adults were enjoying the atmosphere like an adult, and the children were looking at the water looking scared while their hand grasped their parents’ hand tightly.



「Papa.」



「Hm? What is it Myuu?」



Hajime tilted his head at the call of Myuu above his lap who was looking up over her shoulder at Hajime while he was fixing the position of her Santa hat that had shifted. Myuu was asking her papa cheerfully.



「If the shark-san attacks, that onee-san will be the one who defeats it nano?」



「Yeah, I guess. She will shot it with that rifle to protect us.」



「Hm~mm」



When Myuu heard what Hajime said, she began to stare fixedly at the onee-san. The onee-san smiled pleasantly toward the gaze of the cute Santa-san, and she waved her hand a bit. As expected from an onee-san of a theme park. Her zero yen smile was also super first class.



But, if it was a normal child they would be a bit embarrassed before hiding in the shadow of their parent, or they would smile back normally, but in this scene Myuu’s reaction was……



「Fuh」



For some reason, Myuu sighed a little while she shrugged as though to say「Yare yare daze」. A crack entered the onee-san’s super smile! A cramp entered papa Hajime’s expression! (TN: Yare yare daze, I think in English it’s something like ‘oh dear, good grief’)



Using the indispensable technique for a theme park worker, the “Instant Switch”, the Onee-san immediately fixed her smiling face, but Hajime’s expression was still cramped while tapping Myuu’s head. And then, when he asked the reason of Myuu’s attitude just now, she answered「Because, that onee-san looks weak」. It appeared that just now was Myuu’s way of wanting to say「Don’t force yourself okay」.



While that was happening, an event began in the attraction. On the water’s surface, there was a fin that was beginning to appear. The onee-san then shot a warning shot with her rifle. It was a fake rifle without any bullets, but a water splash occurred with matching timing. From the viewpoint of the children, it looked like the onee-san was shooting her rifle and drove away something. In fact, the little kids were raising voices of joy.



However, the boat suddenly shook as though something had pushed it up from below, and wreckages of seriously damaged ships from shark attacks were beginning to appear. The expression of the children began to show nervousness and fear once more. And those feelings reached the peak when a giant shark with its giant jaw opened wide leaped out from the water’s surface.



‘waa―’ ‘kyaa―’ Amidst those resounding excited voices, the onee-san drove away the giant shark with her rifle. However, the shaking boat caused her to slip and fall down. It appeared that her ankle got twisted (of course it was the setting), then saying that she couldn’t shoot the rifle like this, she called to the crowd ‘someone work with me!’. Naturally, the one who would cooperate would be the little kids.



「Go on, Myuu. You too go there.」



「Yes nano.」



A group of little kids fired the rifle given to them by the onee-san looking nervous, or possibly excited. Myuu also joined into that group.



「……Uu~n, how unexpected desu. If it’s Myuu-chan, she should know already about more thanthe real thing, doesn’t she?」



Shia tilted her head even while pleasantly watching Myuu who was making merry at the imitation shark. Myuu was different from normal children because she knew about real monsters of the sea and also about the struggle for life. Yet Myuu’s figure, which was seriously looking excited with this regardless of all that, was a bit strange.



「Fufu. Of course Myuu understands what is going on. But, the strange amusement of a dangerous experience with guaranteed safety caused Myuu to feel that it’s something unusual and interesting instead.」



「……Nn. Recently she’s been getting engrossed in battle games, this is a little bit troubling.」



「There is also our training, and there art also her staying up late at night.」



「Lack of sleep for young children will cause a bad influence on their growth. Hajime-kun, it’s not good unless you firmly warn her, you know?」



Papa Hajime was smiling wryly toward Aiko’s warning while he nodded. That was also something that Hajime was worrying about recently.



「Ah, it’s Myuu-chan’s turn now.」



「Leave the camera to me. Myuu-chan fighting a giant shark, I’ll catch it in the picture perfectly.」



Hearing what Kaori pointed out, Shizuku readied a single-lens reflex camera. The target of that lens was the figure of Myuu who was having a rifle handed to her right now.



Normally the onee-san would gently teach the kid the way of holding the rifle and also help prop up the kid. Then by aiming at the timing when the shark jumped out, she would say「It’s now! Fire!」where sparks would scatter from the shark’s body and mouth, giving a show as though the shark had been shot.



But, the small Santa who received the rifle was a super little girl that had become thoroughly familiar with gunpowder smoke, sparks, and firearms in another world. Furthermore, right now she was a trained little girl that had been forged by her all cheat onee-san and her demon king papa.



Therefore, the moment Myuu received the rifle, she twirled it with a familiar motion and shouldered it on her shoulder before turning her gaze to the water surface. The hands of the onee-san that were going to support the little child were wandering about in the air. That figure which was shouldering a long rifle was strangely looking appropriate on the miniskirt Santa little girl, which caused the eyes of the visitors to blink. Shizuku released the camera shutter. Consecutively.



「Err, I wonder, what is your name young miss~?」



With a professional spirit, the onee-san asked her name.



「It’s Myuu. I am six years old. A woman of the sea.」



「……S, so it’s Myuu-chan! Yoosh, Myuu-chan, if we advance just a little bit more we should be able to escape, so let’s do our best and drive away the scary shark, okay?」



Onee-san is a pro! No matter what kind of tricky customer she faced she wouldn’t waver!



She wouldn’t waver, but Myuu, who heard onee-san’s words of「drive away」, sent a glance at the onee-san as a fearless smile floated on her lips……



「Drive it away nano? That’s also not bad but……no one will mind even if I do the shark in right?」



「No, that will be troubling.」



Onee-san plainly replied!



But, in the next moment, the giant shark jumped out all of a sudden while raising water with it. Myuu instantly readied her rifle. She placed the stock part on her shoulder, her left hand supported the barrel, and her sight lined up with the rear sight. She really looked the part.



The eyes of the onee-san were starting to get far away. The children were going ‘waa’ raising voices of admiration. The adults were directing complicated gazes at Hajime and the others who were Myuu’s guardian.



On that boat which was gradually turning chaotic, the small Santa’s lovely speech resounded.



「I’ll blow off your head nano!」



The sound effect of *dopan* resounded and sparks scattered inside the mouth of the giant shark. The giant shark vanished into the water. Light was also vanishing from the onee-san’s eyes. The voice of the adults cheering the children was already disappearing.



Amidst all that, Myuu, who twirled the rifle with an experienced gesture as expected before resting it on her shoulder, a beat later made a resolute thumbs up with「Myu!」. (TN: Here she is not saying her own name, it was more like a peculiar voice that Myuu sometimes makes.)



「Oh, it’s starting nano!」



The sun had already completely sunk, however, the dazzling light of the theme park that was spreading, as though to exterminate the darkness of night, was illuminating Myuu who was in a good mood. On Hajime’s shoulder, Myuu was pointing at the lead group of the parade.



A night parade was starting in the theme park. Tonight was also Christmas, so the parade was showier and more extravagant than usual. The people who were gathering on the streets were also crowding around until the place was jam-packed.



Hajime’s group were watching the parade that earned a full score in its entertainment, but after a while, suddenly Hajime lowered Myuu down from his shoulder. And then, Hajime put the puzzled Myuu on Tio’s shoulder. If it was Tio, whose height was only a bit shorter than Hajime, then Myuu would still be able to watch the parade.



Hajime exchanged a look with Yue and the others. For the sake of this day, he had prepared this and that and made arrangements with the others beforehand. Due to that, Hajime intended to go away from this spot.



「Myuu. Papa will go away for a bit to do some errands. I’ll come back soon, so wait for a bit here.」



「……Yes nano.」



Hajime felt like something was pulling him back looking at Myuu who made a bit of a lonely expression, but he somehow shook it off. Today was the first grand Christmas event for Myuu. They didn’t make it in time for the previous Christmas because they had only made it back to earth and there was no time, so they only did something like a small party for the family. That was why, no matter what papa Hajime wanted to do that for the sake of his beloved daughter.



Hajime slipped into the crowd of people and vanished. Myuu stared at his figure as he left but was urged by Yue and the others until her gaze returned to the parade. A joyful smile immediately returned to her face, but as expected, when her beloved papa wasn’t with her she seemed unable to go all out enjoying the event.



But, that gloominess too was immediately cleared up.



*shan shan shan shan* Clear bell sounds could be heard. Everyone seemed to think that it was a sound from the parade, but that sound was getting larger which caused the people to go「Hmm?」while tilting their head. Yes, the sound of the bells that were growing increasingly audible was coming from up above.



As though they were guided by an unknown source the people began to look above, and over there was,



「Ah, that’s Santa-san-」



A boy somewhere pointed while raising his voice. Following where the boy pointed the people looked up, and they raised their voices with「Eh, lies, it’s flying!?」, or「Re, reindeer? The real thing!?」「Ama~zing!!」and so on.



Yes, at where the boy was pointing, there was the appearance of reindeer pulling a sleigh that Santa Claus was riding, gliding through the sky.



The normally impossible supernatural phenomenon was something that should make anyone scream, but this place was a country of dreamers. A fantasy world decorated with the unreal and extraordinary. Therefore, everyone was thinking that it was the theme park’s production, their shock was gradually turning into cheers. The staff, whom were doing the parade, were looking up open-mouthed, but the people who were looking up were to busy to notice that.



Before long, Santa Claus, who was riding through the starry sky of the holy night, was swiveling down as though going down through a spiraling staircase that was drawn midair. And then, the sleigh slowly approached the crowd.



The approaching sleigh made the crowd part naturally. The destination of that sleigh was a small Santa-san.



「Merry Christmas, my small compatriot young lady.」



The Santa Claus who got down from the sleigh had a face that was difficult to understand with his white beard and round glasses. He then kneeled in front of Myuu who was put down from Tio’s shoulder.



In response, Myuu blinked her eyes and responded.



「Papa, what are you doing nano?」



「…………………It’s not papa. It’s Santa.」



「Eh, but……」



「It’s Santa.」



「Pa――」



「It’s Saaan, taaa-」



「Ah, yes.」



Myuu nodded repeatedly at the Santa that felt a little desperate. She was an obedient and good child.



Santa nodded in satisfaction at Myuu while ignoring to the utmost Yue and the others whose shoulders were shaking. He then put the large white bag that was piled on the sleigh in front of Myuu.



「Now then, for you who have been a really good kid through this year, here is this present from Santa.」



「Present?」



To Myuu who tilted her head, Santa took out a box that was inlaid with sparkling stones that looked like lovely pink colored gems from his bag. That box was a feminine box that could be presented as a treasure box by itself.



The people who were surrounding them and watching over the development began thinking that this must be an event of the theme park were also going「Ooo」with warm expressions. A voice of a girl somewhere begging to her father「I want that」could be heard.



Amidst all that, Myuu who was receiving the lovely box asked pa――Santa if it was okay to open it with her gaze. Santa nodded.



When the lid was opened……



「Ah」



Myuu unintentionally raised her voice, but that expression which looked perplexed became colored with joy right away. That smile was like a flower bud that bloomed all at once, it was such a full and beautiful smile like a blooming flower.



The present that was inserted into that box was surely a girly present, something like a children’s accessory or a good of some cartoon character. Everyone was thinking along those lines.



But, what was taken out by Myuu was……



「It’s Donner and Schlag nanooo-!!!!」



A pair of handguns…….



People falling down were heard here and there, one after another. There was no doubt that they were people from Osaka (TN: Seems like the custom of falling on their butt from shock came from Osaka). Other people also made tsukkomis from their mouth. However, Myuu herself was swinging around the two handguns going「Finally, Myuu could have this nano!」while expressing great happiness.



The figure of a little girl Santa dancing boisterously from receiving as present during the holy night, a pair of handguns that she seemed to have been begging for previously, could be seen there.



「Young lady, those aren’t Donner-Schlag. They are “Donneer-Schlaag”.」



「Donneer-Schlaag?」



「Yes, Donneer-Schlaag.」



After Santa corrected Myuu like that, he further fished into his white present bag with rummaging sounds.



「Also this, “Pikko Piko Hammeeer”」



「Pikko Piko Hammeeer!!!」



「”This is Weapon Desu”.」



「This is Weapon De~su!」



「We also cannot forget this one, “Muuramasa” and――」



「Muuramasa!!」



「”Kotetsuu”.」



「Kotetsuuuuu!!」



Myuu’s tension was breaking through the heavens (TN: Reference to Gurren Lagann)! She hopped up and down and swung around the weapons she received heartily!



From there Myuu received even more presents. One was a gun belt and another was a present that was named as Yue-oneechan’s love. Myuu then said「Pa――Santa-san! Thank you nano! I, I, I love you nano!!」and leaped into Santa’s chest.



After that, at the other side of the crowd of the dumbfounded people, figures that seemed to be the security staff appeared. Santa, who confirmed the appearance of those staff, immediately boarded his sleigh, and then he snapped the reins and returned to the sky once more. In the middle this everyone was having a question of「Just how in the world it is flying?」while Santa then made his next move so that Myuu and others wouldn’t be bothered by the security.



「Merry Christmas.」



Saying such thing, a lot of parachutes were dropped from the sleigh. The absurd amount of parachutes that were raining down from the sky were all attached with Christmas presents. Obviously, there were presents consisting of toys or stuffed animals, and even some accessories or game systems. Every kind of present was raining down from the sky.



When the bewildered people heard an awfully clear voice that said「They are meager presents from the park. Please help yourself to it.」, they raised a joyful voice of「Waa!!」and rushed toward the parachutes. Because the people were pushing and jostling against each other, Yue nonchalantly supported them with magic so that no accident would happen.



By the way, the number of presents was obviously too many to be loaded on the sleigh, but everyone ignored that in their excitement. They were presents from Santa who was riding on a sleigh driven by lovely reindeer. The atmosphere of the place might’ve caused their mind to feel ‘who cares about the trivial things’.



Although, if they knew that those reindeer were actually mechanical Grim Reapers that were fully loaded with weaponry inside……surely they would panic without a doubt. In this world, there were some things that were better to not know.



The next day, it went without saying that the unprecedented theme park was grandly reported in the news. It also went without saying that the sophisticated production and the generous treat of presents raised the selling point of the park while the higher-ups were searching ‘just who was that Santa!’ with bloodshot eyes.



The really happy expression of the small princess of the Nagumo family also naturally made everyone in the family to writhe from her cuteness. However, her figure that was sleeping together with handguns and a war hammer, whip, and kodachi, while rubbing her cheek on them was……



He was the one who gave her those presents, but now papa Hajime was having a complicated worry of「Is this really fine, for my daughter?」.



AN: Thank you very much for reading this every time.



Thank you very much too for the thoughts, opinions, and reports about misspelling and omitted words.



Even though today is Christmas, Shirakome that is a villager of loneliness village suddenly got an idea and wrote this.



If you like, please read it together with a Christmas cake by yourself.



Shirakome had chocolate cake.





Chapter 188




AN: I posted a Christmas commemoration chapter a page back.



A group carrying assault rifles and wearing masks were rushing through an underground corridor in a dark building. The place they were heading toward was the place where the children who were taken as hostage were imprisoned. Their comrades who were going there went out of contact one after another, so understanding that something strange had happened to them, this group rushed to that place in a panic.



In total there were nearly twenty people in this armed group. One of them, who was running at the very back, heard a sound like something jumping in a room the group was passing by so he came to a stop reflexively. His other comrades were gradually rushing ahead, but the comrades nearby him also stopped running and looked at him questioningly.



He made a gesture that conveyed to his comrades how he had heard a sound come from inside the room, and just in case, he proposed to investigate inside. The men who came to a stop were six in total, they nodded to each other and left behind two people in the corridor as they passed through the opened steel door and stepped inside the room.



Immediately after, *kii* the door was making a sound while it automatically, no, a small hand that wasn’t noticed by anyone was quietly reaching down from the ceiling and closing the door.



One of the men who was left in the corridor spontaneously charged at the door while the other man tried to let out a warning voice, but just before that, gunshots echoed inside the room.



「Gah!?」「Guah」Pained voices could be heard as bullets that flew from the ceiling granted a severe impact to the two men who exposed the back of their head defenselessly. Their consciouses were instantly blown away. The remaining two men turned around and sprayed bullets at the door from where they entered, but there was no scream from the enemy that resounded inside the room.



In exchange,



*click*



A sinister sound resounded from behind them. The two men moved only their eyes to look at each other. Then matching their breathing they turned around all at once. There――



「Slow nano.」



Dangling upside down from the ceiling, with a pair of handguns――”Donneer-Schlaag” aimed at the forehead of the two men, was a figure of a little girl. The two men were about to spit out some swear words, but before they could do that, the girl――Myuu―― pulled the trigger. The heads of the two snapped backward grandly.



*gon* Their heads crashed on the door and interrupted the intrusion of the two remaining men that tried to enter inside for an instant. That instant was a fatal opening against the beloved daughter who had received the teaching of a monster gunner.



The moment the door opened with a force that knocked back the bodies of their comrades, the dry sound of *pan pan* resounded, and at the same time, the two men crumbled down.



……The figure that was dangling from the ceiling, who had lured the enemy into the room before shooting them down, while still in an upside down posture――was truly like the hit man Le○n! (TN: A character from a French movie, ‘Leon’.)



「Now, everyone, before those guys come back, we are going out nano.」



When Myuu called out to the corner of the room, right after that, the corner of the room where there should be nothing suddenly distorted and the figures of the children appeared. Every single one of them was holding a large cross in their palm. Those crosses were the artifact “Don’t Touch, You Pervert”, but as a supplementary function, they also had the concealment ability that made use of light reflection.



「He, hey, Myuu. Just now, how did you stand up on the ceiling?」



While moving, Natalia became unable to endure and asked that. To that Myuu answered with one word「Guts」. Natalia’s shoulders dropped while saying「At least I want you to say that it’s magic……」. Of course, the cause that Myuu could be like Leo○ wasn’t because of guts, but because of the “gravity stone” and “Air Force” inserted into her boots.



But, at that time, the sound of an explosion came from quite a distance away.



「Myuu-chan, just now……I think that came from around the place where we were at earlier.」



「Myu. Perhaps they got caught up in the trap that Myuu set up there and went pyuu nano. Their weapons are excellent, but those criminal-san’s movements are relatively rough.」



「Is, is that so……」



Emile’s cheeks cramped from knowing that it appeared that Myuu had even done something like that by taking into account the movement of the enemy while they hadn’t notice. Or rather, to listen to a ten-year-old girl finding fault in an armed group……it caused him to become bothered about Myuu’s true identity all the more.



Myuu beautifully used gun kata with twin gun art, war hammer art, whip art, and two sword art to thoroughly take care of the enemies she encountered while moving. The children were sending sparkling eyes at Myuu as though they were looking at a hero while following behind her. Finally, they discovered a door that had the word “EXIT” written on it.



It was a door that connected to the outside.



While the expression of Natalia and the others burst bright in joy, Myuu’s expression turned complicated instead. But, at the same time, she could hear the sound of a lot of footsteps from deep within the path they had just passed through, so while sighing deeply, she opened the door while telling Natalia and the others to hold onto the cross firmly.



There,



「So, you are the devil that slipped in among the children, huh.」



A masked group of nearly thirty people that was fully armed was lying in wait while aiming their rifle muzzles at the door. Natalia and the others screamed「Hii」when witnessing that.



Myuu didn’t answer the question of the man who seemed to be the leader of the armed group, instead, she ran her gaze around the surroundings. The place they came out to appeared to be a huge warehouse. If it was normal, there should be a lot of material put in each container that was placed in here.



The nose of Myuu who was a sea dweller race sensed the smell of salt, from there she understood that this place was adjacent with a harbor (she understood that from the beginning already though). Yes, this place was a warehouse district to deposit the luggage of cargo ships.



Right now they were in a warehouse that was jointly established with the management building at the corner of that district. However, inside that warehouse was quite a good amount of strict security. Not to mention the dozens of armed people, there were also a lot of heavy weapons and a lot of computers for the command room lined up. In addition to that, there were also things like an armored vehicle that was in the middle of being camouflaged and a vehicle that looked like an ice cream truck on the outside but it had a gatling gun and so on attached on the inside.



「Uu~n, from the weaponry and the hostage-taking, I have imagined that by some chance it might be like this but……as expected, you all are not mere kidnappers, but a terrorist group nano.」



「Just what the hell are you? A bodyguard prepared by the government?」



The terrorist leader was recalling a kid soldier of his own country in the back of his mind while speaking out his conjecture. Be that as it may, it was hard to believe the fact that a single girl like this was able to beat up his organization’s soldiers, and he was also concerned from where this girl got her weapon.



By all rights, this girl was an irregular existence, someone like Myuu whose identity they couldn’t confirm should be quickly killed, but her abnormality made this leader question her.



「Myuu’s smartphone, where is it nano?」



「……Answer my question.」



Even though it should be a checkmate with nearly thirty guns aimed at them, Myuu’s composed attitude didn’t break and she instead questioned back. This caused the leader’s voice to go lower.



「I want you to answer first nano. If you do that, then I’ll answer.」



「Do you think you are in the position where you can negotiate?」



Myuu’s way of speaking was retorted by the leader with the rise of one of his hands. Immediately, a gunshot resounded. One of his underlings had aimed at Natalia and fired. But, naturally, because Natalia’s hand was clutching “Don’t Touch, You Pervert”, the bullet was blocked by an invisible wall and stopped midair.



The terrorists became agitated and went noisy. Amidst all that, the leader was also looking in wonderment, but he then opened his mouth without losing his calm.



「……What is that? So America has even developed something like that.」



「Rather than that, where is the smartphone nano?」



The leader guessed that the cause of Myuu’s composure was because of that invinsible shield, however, in the back his mind a solution appeared immediately, that they could just directly take away the shield if a gun didn’t work. If they could steal that shield, it would be advantageous for their terrorist activities from here on. Thinking that he snickered in his heart.



Perhaps the leader felt whimsical from the composure that he had just obtained because he answered Myuu’s question by moving his gaze. The place where his gaze pointed was a corner of the simple command room where there were a lot of computers gathered. Most likely the smartphones of the other children were also there.



「So, who are you?」



This time the leader questioned her. Because he had taught Myuu the smartphone’s location, he felt that this time it was Myuu’s turn to answer. In response to that, Myuu was making an exasperated expression.



「There is no way I will answer nano. You must have something wrong in your head if you are accepting what your enemy said seriously like that nano.」



The leader was wearing a mask, but surely right now a vein was throbbing visibly on his forehead. Really, he wanted to see the face of the parent that was raising this girl.



「Are you thinking that because you have that shield that all of you are absolutely safe? Something like that can just be wrestled off directly and taken away, and that’s it. I thought that you were someone that had received special training, but you cannot even make a proper situation assessment. Did I overestimate you? Or else, are you thinking that you can do something against this number of people with those tiny guns or those primitive weapons?」



「……」



The hand of the leader rose quietly. A man at his side guessed what the leader wanted and whispered something into a wireless earpiece, and then another group of armed men with more than ten people appeared from the door behind them. In addition to that, a group of thirty men flooded in from outside the warehouse and surrounded Myuu and the children.



「Don’t take up our time too much. We are going to be busy with our operation after this. There are still more than fifty men outside. There is no place for you all to escape. Go back to your prison obediently. Perhaps you kids will be able to return home alive depending on your parents’ attitude, you know?」



The leader slapped the children with despair. He showed them the overwhelming difference in battle strength and also dangled a slight hope in front of their eyes. Natalia clutched tightly to the sleeve of Myuu’s clothes. The other children were also snuggling Myuu with scared expressions.



Myuu looked over her shoulder to them while showing a smile that had not even a speck of despair. It was a fearless smile that would make anyone gulp. Her canine was exposed, her eyes were glaring with fierce atrocity, and her back was straight and imposing.



Myuu turned to the leader again, then stored “Donneer-Schlaag” in their holsters.



「That’s right, that’s how you――」



「Difference of strength? That’s too much even for a misunderstanding.」



The leader took a step forward thinking that Myuu had resigned herself, but his step reflexively stopped from Myuu’s words that interrupted his own words. At the same time, he saw the figure of Myuu quietly rising her hand straight up.



And then, the crimson jewel that was fixed on the ring finger of that left hand was beginning to shine for some reason. Noticing that, the leader gazed in astonishment.



Myuu fearlessly grinned while resounding her words boldly.



「Since when were you under the delusion that Myuu is alone?」



「Wh, at?」



Right after that, a crimson light burst out. The terrorists who pulled their triggers spontaneously witnessed it. The bullets they fired were blocked, not by an invisible shield, but by a physical obstruction.



Six metallic arms. Multiple legs like a spider. On the back, and on the front, were multiple weapons that looked brutal even from just a glance. Stylish heads, and eyes that suddenly flashed! Strange looking warriors with a metallic composition――there were seven of them.



Walling in Myuu and the children, those bodies that boasted the greatest hardness blocked all the bullets, yes, they were……
